Mike is kicking the soccer ball away from Jenny. Jenny is chasing Mike to get the ball. Jenny is wearing a silly hat. 
Mike kicks the ball to Jenny. Jenny will try to catch the ball. The owl sits in the tree. 
The sun is partly behind a tree. Mike is angrily kicking the soccer ball. Jenny is crying as she plays with Mike. 
Mike has a gold crown. The soccer ball is high in the air. Jenny is scared of the lightning. 
There is a viking hat on the playground toy. Jenny is running to get the ball from Mike. Mike does not want to share the ball with Jenny. 
Mike has a soccer ball on his foot. Jenny is jumping up and down. The apples in the tree are red. 
Jenny & Mike are playing soccer together. Jenny is crying because she doesn't like soccer. Mike is happy to be playing with his friend Jenny again. 
Mike is kicking the soccer ball. The cat is watching Jenny and Mike. It is a sunny day. 
Mike has on sunglasses. Jenny is running to Mike. Mike kicked the soccer ball. 
Mike misses the ball. Jenny runs after the ball. Jenny yells at Mike. 
Mike and Jenny are playing in the sandbox Jenny is standing next to the bucket Jenny is waving to the owl 
Jenny stood in the sandbox. Mike was playing in the sand. The owl wanted to play in the sand with the kids. 
Mike is waving to the owl. Jenny is scooping sand. The owl is in the tree. 
Mike and Jenny play in the sandbox. Mike is holding the mustard. Mike has a tennis racket. 
Mike and Jenny are standing in the sandbox. There is an owl in the apple tree. Mike is worried about the owl. 
Jenny is sitting in the sand box. Mike is standing next to the sand box. The pail is sitting next to the sand box. 
the owl is in the tree Jenny is waving at Mike Mike is sitting next to the sandbox 
The owl is in the pine tree. There is a bucket by the sandbox. Jenny is kicking sand at Mike. 
Mike is very shock. jenny is very happy. Jenny is near a apple tree. 
Mike and Jenny stand in the sandbox Mike is trying to play with the owl Jenny is playing with her bucket 
Jenny and Mike look angry at each other. There is a pie near Jenny. There is a beach ball near Mike. 
Jenny has a pie. Mike is looking at Jenny. Mike is standing beside the swing. 
Jenny is very mad. Jenny is holding a pie. Jenny is in the sand-box. 
Mike is holding a bat. Jenny is very angry. Jenny is holding a pie 
Jenny is sitting by a pizza. Jenny baked a pie. Mike is running around. 
Mike wants the pie. Jenny is waving at something. The duck is walking away from the table. 
Jenny won't share her pie. Mike wants Jenny's pie. The dog sees the duck. 
Mike is angry because he wants the pie. The hot air ballon is high in the sky. It is a cloudy day today. 
Jenny is holding a pie. Mike is holding a baseball bat. Mike and Jenny are angry. 
Jenny is holding the pie. Mike is wearing the hat. Mike is sad because he wants the pie. 
There is lightning coming from the cloud. There are apples on the tree. Mike kicked the soccer ball. 
Mike kicked the ball. A dog is looking at Mike. Mike is wearing a hat. 
Lightning is striking. Mike is kicking the soccer ball. The dog is near the apple tree. 
Lighting strikes the soccer ball. Mike is wearing a hat. A rocket ship is flying in the sky. 
Mike is kicking a soccer ball. The bubble bee ride is under the apple tree. No one is playing in the sand box. 
Mike is kicking the soccer ball. Mike is standing next to an apple tree. A storm cloud is in the sky. 
Mike is kicking the soccer ball. Jenny is afraid of the storm. Jenny has a red bucket. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is kicking the ball. 
Lightning strikes by the soccer ball. Mike looks surprised by the lightning. Jenny looks angrily at the lightning. 
Mike is near jenny. Jenny is very surprised. A soccer-ball is on the grass. 
The hotdog is on the picnic table. The ketchup is on the picnic table. The tennis ball is beside the dog. 
The cat is looking at the hot dog. The ketchup and the hot dog are on the table. Lightning is coming from the cloud. 
There is a hot-air balloon in the sky. There is a hot dog on the picnic table. The cat is sitting by the picnic table. 
The cat sat on the table. The hotdog was next to the ketchup on the table. The cat  hotdog and ketchup were sitting on the table. 
Mike is standing by the pit. The cat is sitting by the tree. The table is sitting by the tree. 
The cat is on the table. The hot dog is in front of the cat. Mike and Jenny have went home. 
The hot dog is on the table. The cat is behind to the table. The ketchup is on the table. 
The cat is sitting by the table. The hot dog is sitting on the table. The pit is by the table. 
It is a sunny day. The cat is sitting alone. There is a helicopter in the sky. 
Mike is angry because Jenny is running away. The hot dog is on the table. The cat is looking at the hot dog. 
Owl watches Mike and Jenny play. Mike and Jenny play in the sun. Mike and Jenny play with a beach ball. 
Jenny and Mike are playing balls in a sunny day Jenny is standing next to a swing a bird is sitting on a tree. 
Jenny is sad because she dropped the ball. Mike is jumping in the air. A hot air balloon is in the sky. 
Jenny and Mike are playing with a beach ball. Jenny is standing beside a sandbox. Mike is standing in front of a swing set. 
Mike threw the beach ball. Mike and Jenny are playing catch. Jenny is going to catch the beach ball. 
Jenny is waving at Mike. Mike is throwing the ball to Jenny. The sun is directly over Mike's head. 
The duck is next to the snake. Jenny is throwing the ball to Mike. Mike is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike & Jenny have new sunglasses. Mike & Jenny play kick the ball. Mike & Jenny are having fun. 
Mike is catching the beach ball. The brown dog is next to Jenny. It is sunny today. 
Jenny is kicking a beach ball. Mike is preparing to catch the ball. The sun is shining on Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny gives Mike his pirate hat. The dog wants to play with the beach ball. Mike sees his dog has followed him to the park. 
Jenny is the captain of the yard. The dog is protecting Jenny. Mike sees danger ahead of Jenny. 
Mike is wearing a black hat. Jenny is wearing a vikings hat. a beach-ball is near a dog. 
The dog is standing near the ball. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. Jenny's hat has horns. 
Jenny is excited to see her friend. The dog waits for them to play. It is a sunny day outside. 
Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. A dog is standing by a beach ball. Mike is sitting beside Jenny. 
Jenny and mike are angry at the dog. The dog is next to the ball. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. 
Jenny is telling Mike a story. The dog is next to the ball. Mike has a pirate's hat. 
A dog balances a ball on its nose. Mike is startled by Jenny's shout. Jenny is happy to see Mike scared. 
Mike is upset and waving his arms. Jenny is angry and kicked the beach ball. Mike has on a pirate hat. 
Jenny and Mike are playing frisbee. Jenny and Mike are having fun. The sun is shining brightly in the park. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is playing with mike. A duck is standing in the grass. 
Jenny and Mike are playing frisbee. Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. 
The man in the ballon is waving in the sky. Mike throws the frisbee to Jenny. The cat is happy sitting by the sandbox. 
Jenny is throwing the frisbee. Mike is catching the frisbee. The balloon is flying in the sky. 
Mike threw the Frisbee. There is a riding toy beside the tree. The hot air balloon is in the sky. 
Mike is catching the Frisbee. Jenny threw the Frisbee. There is a balloon in the park. 
Jenny is tossing a frisbee to Mike. Mike is playing frisbee with Jenny. Jenny is standing in front of a tree. 
Jenny is throwing the frisbee to Mike. The snake is in between Jenny and Mike. The baseball is on the ground. 
Jenny throws the frisbee. Mike tries to catch the frisbee. There is a cloud in the sky. 
The snake is chasing Jenny and Mike. Jenny is afraid of the snake. The snake is green and big. 
Mike is wearing a hat. A snake is standing behind Jenny. An airplane is flying in the sky. 
Jenny is running from the snake. Mike is sitting next to the football. The tree is behind Jenny. 
The snake chases after Jenny. Mike yells at the snake. Jenny runs away from the snake. 
There is a hot-air balloon in the sky. Jenny runs from the snake crying. Mike is holding a hamburger. 
A snake is behind Jenny. A picnic table is beneath the tree. Jenny is sad  but Mike is surprised. 
The snake is behind Jenny. There is a thunderstorm. Mike is scared of the snake. 
Jenny is running away from the snake. Mike is afraid of the snake. Jenny is holding a pink shovel. 
Mike is sitting down. The dog is next to Mike. Jenny is being chased by the snake. 
Mike is sitting on the picnic table. Jenny is running from the snake. A helicopter is flying in the sky. 
Mike is sitting on the grass with a drink. Jenny is running around to get exercise. There is a helicopter flying near the park. 
Jenny wants to play tennis. Mike does not have a tennis racket. The cat is sitting under the apple tree. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is wearing a hat. Jenny has a racket. 
Jenny wants to play tennis. Mike is petting a cat. The cat thinks tennis is boring. 
Mike is jumping in the air. Jenny has a tennis racket. Mike and Jenny are happy to be playing. 
Mike and Jenny are playing tennis at the park. It's is sunny outside today. They are having a lot of fun together. 
Jenny wants to play tennis. Mike waves at Jenny. Jenny wears sunglasses. 
A disc is on the ground. Jenny has a tennis racket. Some food is on the grill. 
Mike is happy to see Jenny. Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny wants to play tennis. 
Mike's hat has a white star on it. Jenny is playing with a tennis ball. Mike and Jenny are happy playing together. 
Jenny is wearing black sunglasses. Mike kicks the football high. The big balloon is red and yellow. 
Mike is going to kick the football. Jenny is afraid to catch the football. The dog is by the tree. 
Jenny is holding the football. Jenny is wearing purple sunglasses. There is a hot-air balloon in the sky. 
The dog is watching Jenny throw a football. Mike is waiting to catch the football. There is a hot-air balloon in the sky. 
Jenny was happy to play with the football. Mike doesn't want a girl to play with his football. Mike had his dog in the park. 
jenny is very shock. Mike is near a dog. Mike is playing football. 
Jenny and Mike are playing with a football. There is one cloud in the sky. The dog watches Jenny and Mike play. 
Jenny is near a duck. Mike is near a dog. Mike and jenny are playing. 
A hot-air balloon has landed in the distance. Mike kicked the football. Jenny is going to catch the football. 
The hot-air balloon is flying in the sky. Mike and Jenny are throwing a football. The dog is watching Mike and Jenny play. 
jenny has on a hat. Jenny is sitting in the grass. Jenny is near a slide-set. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. It is raining at the park. The pail is by the slide. 
Mike is kicking the ball to Jenny. Jenny is standing in the rain. The dog is watching Mike and Jenny play. 
Jenny is angry because it is raining. The cat is under the tree. The tree is very big. 
It is rainy in the park. Jenny wants to go home now. Jenny was playing on the slide. 
Jenny is holding a baseball. Jenny is running. It is about to rain on Jenny. 
Jenny dropped the basketball. Rain is dropping from the cloud. The cat is watching Jenny. 
It is raining over the slide. The slide goes into the sand box. Jenny is by the apple tree. 
Jenny is very surprised. Jenny is near a bee. Jenny is near a slide. 
Jenny is unhappy because it's raining. Jenny has some balloons with her at the park. Jenny is swinging at the park when it begins to rain. 
Jenny is sitting down to catch the baseball. Mike has hit the baseball with a bat. A cloud is beginning to cover the sun. 
Mike and Jenny were playing baseball. Jenny wants to take a time out. Mike wants Jenny to throw the baseball. 
Jenny is happy to see Mike. The airplane is flying near the sun. Mike and Jenny are playing baseball. 
Mike and Jenny are startled by the airplane. The orange cat watches Mike and Jenny play baseball. Mike hits the ball to Jenny who is ready to catch it with her glove. 
Jenny has sunglasses on. The sun is out. Mike has a baseball bat. 
Mike and Jenny like to play baseball. Mike has a baseball bat. Jenny throws the baseball. 
Mike and Jenny are playing baseball. Mike and Jenny are running to the baseball. Mike has a baseball bat. 
Mike is throwing the ball. Jenny is wearing the glove. Jenny is catching the ball. 
Jenny threw the baseball. Mike is running for the ball. Mike and Jenny play by the tree. 
Mike is holding a bat. Jenny is holding a ball and a mitt. Mike and Jenny are both happy. 
Mike is excited to have pizza for lunch. Jenny decorated the picnic table with balloons. Jenny brought a picnic to the park. 
Mike is wearing sun glasses. The pie is on the table. Jenny is going to eat the pizza. 
Jenny is standing by the pie. Mike is standing by the pizza. The food is on the picnic table. 
Mike is standing by the table. Jenny is holding the pizza. The pie is on the table. 
Mike and Jenny have pizza. Mike and Jenny are happy. Mike has on a blue shirt. 
There is a picnic table with food. Mike and Jenny are happy to see the food. The beach ball is indifferent. 
Mike and Jenny are happy. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. The pie is on the table. 
Jenny is offering a pizza. Mike is excited about pie. Mike and Jenny are having a picnic. 
Jenny is happy  she likes pizza. Mike is wearing a ball cap with a star. Mike wants a piece of pizza. 
Mike waves hello to Jenny. Jenny brought pie for dessert. Mike and Jenny will have a picnic. 
Mike is standing outside the tent. Jenny is scared of the snake. The tree has red apples on it. 
jenny is very surprised. Mike is very happy. Jenny scared of the snake. 
A helicopter is in the sky. Jenny is sitting in the grass. A snake is crawling towards Jenny. 
Jenny is afraid of the snake. Mike tries to kick the snake. Jenny is sitting outside the tent. 
There is a green scary snake. Mike is wearing a hat with a star. Jenny is playing with a football. 
Jenny is holding a drink The burgers are on the grill Mike is walking towards the snake 
A rocket ship is in the sky. A snake is beside the campfire. Jenny is sitting beside the tent. 
Mike is wearing a pirate hat Mike is scaring a snake away Jenny is waving at the snake 
Mike found a snake. Jenny is afraid of the snake. The owl is perched in the apple tree. 
Mike is running towards the snake. Jenny looks scared of the snake. Jenny and Mike are at a campsite. 
A snake is in the sandbox. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. It is a sunny day. 
Mike is alone at the park with is dog. Mike is scared because there is a snake in the sandbox. Mike is also startled by the lightening. 
Mike is wearing a snow hat. The airplane flys high in the sky. The snake is in the sandbox! 
Mike is scared because he see's a snake near the sandbox. Mike doesn't know if he should cry or run away. The snake is confused  it only wants to play. 
A green snake is in the sandbox. Mike is scared. Mike is holding a tennis racket. 
The green snake is in the sandbox. The sandbox is full of sand. The airplane is leaving. 
Mike finds a snake in the sandbox. Mike has thrown his frisbee in the sandbox. Mike is scared of the snake. 
A snake is in the sandbox. A plane flies nearby. Mike is wearing a Viking hat. 
The green snake is wearing a crown. The beach ball is next to the sandbox. Mike saw the snake next to his shovel. 
There is a green snake in the sandbox. Mike is afraid of snakes. The green snake likes Mike's funny hat. 
Mike is scared of the dog A cloud is in front of the sun Mike went down the slide 
Mike slid down the slide. Jenny is going down the slide. There is one cloud in the sky. 
Mike did not enjoy the slide. Jenny is worried Mike fell. The sun is peeking from behind the clouds. 
Mike is wearing a crown. Jenny is wearing a beanie. Someone left the beach ball on the other side of the park. A cloud is in front of the sun. Mike is wearing a crown. Jenny is wearing a hat. 
Mike fell off the slide and hurt his hand. Jenny was so worried for mike when he fell and hurt his hand. The duck quietly walked away after he pushed Mike down the slide. 
Mike fell off the slide and hurt his leg Jenny is worried of Mike's injuries The slide is red 
Jenny and Mike are sad. Mike is playing on the slide. Jenny is playing in the sandbox. 
Mike plays on the slide Jenny runs towards Mike Mike and Jenny are playing under the sun 
Mike slides down the slide. Mike wears sunglasses. Mike loses his ball. 
Mike is sitting by the slide. Jenny is standing by Mike. The sun is shinning. 
Mike is going down the slide. Jenny is wearing a baseball cap. Jenny is holding a baseball. 
Jenny can't place baseball with a racket. Mike wants to slide. Jenny drops the baseball glove. 
Jenny is holding a tennis racket. Mike is waving to Jenny. The dog isn't playing with Jenny and Mike. 
Jenny is holding the racket. Mike is on the slide. The slide is near the tree. 
Mike is sliding down the slide. Jenny wants to play tennis. The cat is sitting next to Jenny. 
Mike is on the slide. A ball is on the ground by Jenny. Jenny is standing by the slide. 
Mike is laying on the slide. Jenny is holding a baseball. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
Jenny is very happy. Jenny is holding a ball. Mike is very happy. 
Mike is on the slide. Jenny is holding a racket. Jenny is holding a ball. 
It is a sunny day. Mike is going down the slide. Jenny is holding a racket and a baseball. 
There is lightening and rain in the sky. The swing set has two swings. There is a bucket in the sandbox. 
Mike and Jenny are not in the park. It is raining and lightning in the park. The swing set is empty. 
There is a bucket in the sandbox. It is raining on the bbq. The swings are empty. 
The swings are empty. The sandbox is empty. Rain is falling from the sky. 
The cat is sitting by the ball. It is raining in the park. The table is next to the swing. 
The park is empty today. No one is playing in the sandbox. It is raining and lightning. 
There is rain and lightning in the sky. There is a pink bucket in the sandbox. The swings are moving from the wind. 
It is raining at the park. It is stormy at the park today. Mike and Jenny went home. 
Rain comes from the cloud There's lightning in the sky a pink pale is in a sandbox 
The pail is in the sand box. The ball is in the sand box. The duck is sitting on the table. 
Mike is looking for the baseball. The hat is on the table. The glasses are on the table. 
An airplane is in the sky. A ball is in the sandbox. A cloud is in the sky. 
Mike is playing soccer. The cat is behind the tree. Mike is sad about missing the ball. 
Mike is playing football. Mike is sad that Jenny is not there. The owl is in the apple tree. 
Mike kicked the ball. Mike is wearing sunglasses. Mike is running by the tree. 
A plane is flying over Mike's head. There is a pink bucket behind Mike. Mike just kicked the soccer ball. 
Mike is wearing a whirlygig cap. Mike is holding a pink bucket. Mike is sad his toe hurts. 
Mike is kicking the air. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. There are apples on the tree. 
Mike is kicking the frisbee. Mike is wearing sunglasses. The cat is watching Mike. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Mike is holding the frisbee. The air plaine is flying in the sky. 
Jenny is carrying pizza and a hamburger. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is standing at the grill. 
Jenny brought a pepperoni pizza. Mike is sitting in the grass. There is a hamburger on the grill. 
Jenny has a pizza and a burger. Mike is not happy. Some food is on the grill. 
Jenny is wearing a golden crown. Mike is wearing a chefs hat. Mike is standing next to the grill. 
There is a pizza and a burger on the table. There are three burgers on the grill. Jenny and the dog are standing together. 
Jenny is standing by the table. Mike is wearing the hat. The pizza is on the table. The pizza is on the table. Jenny is going to eat the pizza. Mike is wearing a red and gray hat. 
Mike is wearing a chef's hat. Lightning is striking near the grill. Jenny is reaching for the pizza. 
having food serving barbecue 
Mike is sad because he wants pizza. Jenny has a hamburger and a pizza. Jenny is keeping food from Mike. 
Jenny is holding a hamburger. Mike is beside the picnic table. The grill is in front of the picnic table. 
The owl is near the bottom of the tree. The basketball is under the tree. Jenny is watching the owl. 
The owl is wearing a blue hat. Jenny is near the camp fire. The tent is behind the pine tree. 
Jenny is trying to talk to a wizard owl. The wizard owl doesn't care for Jenny. Jenny is very happy to see an owl. 
Jenny gave the owl her wizard hat Jenny is standing next to a tree Jenny is standing next to an owl 
An owl is in the tree. Jenny sits on the picnic table. Jenny is happy. 
Jenny calls the owl Jenny is wearing a viking helmet Jenny holds a pink pale 
An owl is wearing a wizard's hat. A cloud is covering the sun. Jenny is waving to the owl. 
Jenny is happy to see the owl Jenny is wearing a crown Jenny is sitting under the sun 
The owl is wearing a witch's cap. The owl is sitting in the tree. Jenny is looking startled and waving. 
Jenny is wearing purple hat. A owl is in a tree. A cat is under a tree. 
A cat is playing in the sandbox. Jenny can't play in the sandbox. Mike shows Jenny the cat. 
The cat is a wizard. Jenny is in the rain. Mike is sitting in the sandbox. 
The cat is in the sand box. Mike wore purple sunglasses. Jenny is crying. 
Mike threw the ball. Jenny is running from the cat. The cat is sitting in the sandbox. 
Jenny is sitting in the sandbox. Mike is running towards Jenny. The sandbox is under the tree. 
There is a cat in the sandbox. Mike looks happy to see the swings. Jenny looks upset at the cat. 
The cat is in the sand box. The shovel is in the sand box. Mike is sitting by the sand box. 
Jenny is standing under the tree. The cat is in the sandbox. Mike is standing under the sun. 
The cat sits in the sandbox. Mike wants the cat to come to him. There is a helicopter in the sky. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Jenny is standing by the sand box. The cat is sitting in the sand box. 
Jenny is trying to catch a ball. Mike is by an apple tree. Jenny is near a slide with a cat. 
Jenny is wearing the sun glasses. Jenny is wearing the glove. Mike is holding the ball. 
Mike is in the tree. Jenny throws the ball to Mike. Jenny wears sunglasses. 
Mike is sitting in the tree. Jenny is wearing a baseball cap. Jenny has a baseball mitt. 
Mike is sitting in the tree. Jenny is worried. A baseball is in the air. 
Mike is sitting in the large tree. Jenny happily tosses the baseball towards Mike. The sun shines brightly above Jenny's head. 
Jenny is very happy. Jenny is wearing purple shades. Mike is holding a glove. 
Jenny is catching a baseball. The dog is running after Mike. There is a gray cloud in the sky. 
Mike is sitting in the tree. Jenny and Mike are playing catch. The dog is watching Mike and Jenny play. 
Mike is in the tree. Jenny is going to throw the ball. The table is under the tree. 
Jenny is angry because Mike didn't throw the frisbee to her. Jenny is wearing a grey and red hat. Mike is wearing a hat with a star on it. 
A hot air balloon is in the sky. Mike is sitting in the grass. Jenny is mad  and Mike is surprised. 
Mike has a colorful hat on. Jenny is very upset. There's a freeze-be behind mike. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The cat is sitting beside Jenny. Mike is kicking the frisbee. 
A rain cloud is covering the sun. The cat is getting rained on. Mike is sitting with a Frisbee. 
There is a helicopter in the sky. Mike is sitting near the frisbee. Jenny is wearing a blue hat. 
Mike has a blue hat on. Mike in very surprised. Mike is sitting in the grass. 
A snake is after Mike. Mike is scared of the snake. Jenny is holding a soda. 
Mike is sitting on the floor confused. Queen Jenny has been angered. Mike is matching particularly well today. 
Jenny's face is angry. There are toys on the ground. A cat is sitting in the sand box. 
Jenny is happy to see Mike. Mike is sad today. The owl is wearing a pirate hat. 
Jenny is in front of Mike Mike is beside the table There's a plane above Mike 
The duck is eating the pizza. Mike is wearing a silly hat. The balloons are in the sandbox. 
Mike waves hi to Jenny. The two balls are on the ground. The cloud is raining. 
Mike has on sunglasses. Jenny is holding a frisbee. The owl is looking at Mike and Jenny. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Mike is holding balloons. Jenny is happy because she wants the balloons. 
Jenny is holding a duck. Jenny is wearing a beanie with a propellor. Jenny is in front of a tree and a slide. 
Jenny is wearing her glasses. Mike is wearing a blue hat. There is an apple tree behind Mike. 
The duck is on Jenny's head. The owl is on Mike's head. Mike is holding a hamburger and soda. 
There is an air balloon in the sky. There is a duck behind Mike and Jenny. Mike is wearing purple sunglasses. 
The owl is sitting on the swings. Mike is wearing a witch hat. Jenny is wearing a chef hat. 
Mike dances while he wears a witch hat. Jenny laughs at Mike dancing. It is raining  but Jenny and Mike stay outside. 
Jenny is waving to Mike. Mike is happy to see Jenny. It is cloudy and rainy today. 
Jenny is standing by the sand box. The dog is standing by the swing. It is raining in the park. 
It is a rainy day. Mike is wearing a winter cap. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
It is raining on Mike and Jenny. Jenny is wearing a helicopter hat. Mike is waiving at Jenny. 
Mike is standing by the ball. Jenny is holding the balloonsf. Jenny is standing by the tree. 
Mike is quite happy. Rain is falling from the sky. Jenny is near the slide. 
Mike is wearing a baseball mitt. There are two balls in the grass. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
Mike and Jenny are at the park for a picnic. They want to play in the sandbox. It has started to rain on Mike and Jenny. 
Mike and Jenny are holding hands. Mike and Jenny are playing in the sand box. The cat is wearing a beanie. 
Jenny and Mike are playing ball. Mike has a baseball bat. The orange cat watches them play. 
Mike sees a cat. There is a helicopter in the sky. Mike and Jenny are in a sandbox. 
Mike is sitting by the sand box. The cat is sitting by Jenny. The pail is sitting next to the sand box. 
The cat is playing in the sandbox. Mike is playing in the sandbox. Jenny shows Mike the cat playing in the sandbox. 
Mike threw the Frisbee to Jenny. Jenny is going to catch the Frisbee. Mike and Jenny are playing Frisbee in the park. 
Mike and Jenny sit in the sandbox. The cat looks at Mike and Jenny. A hot air ballon floats by. 
Jenny and Mike are sitting on the ground. The cat is watching Jenny and Mike. Mike has the beach ball. 
Jenny is throwing the ball to Mike. Mike is sitting on the ground. Jenny is standing by the sandbox. 
Jenny wants Mike to play basketball instead. Mike wants to play in the sandbox  not with Jenny. The cat is watching Mike and Jenny play. 
Jenny is bringing Mike an owl. Mike is waving to Jenny. The sun is behind a tree. 
Mike is standing by the tree. Jenny is holding the owl. Jenny is standing by the table. 
Jenny likes to play with her pet owl. Mike sees an apple pie on the table. Mike is wearing a blue shirt. 
Jenny is holding the owl. Mike wants to play with the owl too. The pie is on the table. 
Mike is very happy. Mike is waving at someone. Jenny s very happy. 
An owl sits on Jenny's arm. Mike is happy to see Jenny. Jenny runs to Mike. 
Mike is waving to Jenny. The soda is on the table. The owl is behind Jenny. 
Jenny is holding an owl. Mike and Jenny are happy. The sun is behind a cloud. 
Jenny is wearing a witch's cap. Jenny is holding the owl. Jenny is standing by an apple tree. 
Mike is happy to see Jenny Jenny is sad the owl has landed on her arm. Jenny has round purple sunglasses on. 
Jenny is beside the bat. The glove is between Jenny and Mike. Jenny is wearing a blue hat. 
A tiny rocket flies above the apple tree. Mike laughs as he holds the baseball bat. Jenny waves and laughs at the tree. 
Jenny is holding a baseball bat. Mike threw his glove down. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
Jenny and Mike are playing baseball. Mike is sitting with his legs crossed. Mike is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike is holding a baseball bat. Jenny is going to be the catcher. The dog wants to play baseball too. 
Mike and Jenny are sitting in the grass. Jenny is touching the grass. Mike and Jenny are done playing baseball. 
The sun is shining. Mike and Jenny are happy that it is not raining. Mike wants to play baseball with Jenny. 
Mike and Jenny are holding hands. Mike is holding a baseball bat. The soccer ball is sitting in the grass. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very happy. jenny is holding a glove. 
Mike is sitting by Jenny. Jenny is happy with Mike. The hot air ballon is high above. 
Jenny is under the apple tree. Mike is angry at the cat and dog. Mike's pail is by his right foot. 
Mike is talking to the animals. Jenny is waiving at Mike. The apples on the tree are red. 
It is a sunny day. Mike is sitting down with the cat and dog. Jenny is running by the tree. 
The dog is facing Mike. Jenny is sitting on the ground. The rocket is flying over the apple tree. 
Mike cannot find Jenny. Jenny is hiding behind the apple tree. Mike asks the cat and dog where Jenny is. 
Mike cannot find the mustard. Jenny is hiding behind the tree. Mike wonders where Jenny is. 
There is a single cloud in the sky. Jenny is hiding behind the tree. Mike is sitting with the cat and dog. 
Jenny is sitting under the tree. The dog and cat are beside Mike. Mike is waving at Jenny. 
Jenny is hiding from Mike. Mike is playing with the cat and dog. The plane is in the sky. 
Jenny is running to play with Mike. Mike is telling his dog to go home. Mike threw the Frisbee. 
Jenny is sad because it's raining on the pie. Mike is wearing a blue cap. A lightning bolt is striking from the cloud. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is holding a pie. A hot-dog is on a table. 
There is an apple tree next to Mike. There is a slide behind Jenny. Jenny looks sadly at the pie. 
Jenny is holding a pie. Mike is happy  but Jenny is sad. It is raining on the picnic table. 
Jenny is bringing Mike a pie. Mike is excited to eat the pie. Mike is wearing a blue cap on his head. 
Mike is wearing purple sunglasses Jenny offers Mike a pie Mike is beside a tent 
Jenny is very angry. Mike is very happy. A pie is on a table. 
Jenny's pie is being rained on. Mike loves thunderstorms. Mike put all the balls under the tree. 
It is raining on the pie. Jenny is sad today. Mike is sitting on the ground wearing sunglasses. 
Mike is near jenny. Jenny is not happy. Jenny is sitting in the grass. 
Jenny is bring Mike some pie. Jenny is wearing two hats. A baseball is in a hole in the tree. 
Jenny is carrying a pie. Mike is wearing a hat. Jenny is smiling at Mike. 
Jenny made a pie. Mike wants to have a slice. Jenny shares her pie with Mike. 
Jenny is wearing a crown and funny hat Jenny is holding pie Mike wants some of Jenny's pie 
Jenny has baked a pie. Mike loves to eat pie. The owl sits in the tree. 
Mike is carrying a drink. Jenny has a pie. Jenny is wearing a viking hat. 
Mike is near jenny. A colorful hat is on the table A crown hat is on a table. 
Jenny is holding a pie Jenny is wearing a spinny hat There's a pirate hat beside Jenny 
Jenny brought Mike a pie. The owl watches Mike and Jenny from the tree. Mike is wearing a crown today. 
Jenny has a pie. Mike has a cold drink. Mike and Jenny are happy. 
Mike wants to play Frisbee with his dog. Jenny is happy to see the dog. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. 
Mike is happy to see the puppy. Jenny wears a colorful cap. Mike wears a colorful cap. 
Mike and Jenny are calling the dog over. The pie is on the picnic table. A duck stands by Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is wearing a hat. The dog is looking at Mike and Jenny. 
Mike is very happy. Mike is holding a tennis ball. A dog is near mike. 
Mike is standing by the dog. Jenny is standing by the dog. The helicopter is flying in the sky. 
Mike and Jenny are playing fetch with the dog. Jenny is by the apple tree. There are eight red apples on the tree. 
Mike's blue hat fell off. Jenny is jumping. The dog is between Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny has a hot dog. Jenny will share with the brown dog. Mike's blue hat has a white star. 
A helicopter is in the sky. Mike has a hat on. A dog is between Jenny and Mike. 
Jenny is playing in the sandbox. The plane is flying away. The cat is sitting next to Jenny. 
Jenny plays with the orange cat. Jenny wants to play baseball. The orange cat watches Jenny. 
A man is waving at Jenny from his hot air balloon. Jenny is happy that her cat has jumped into the sandbox to play with her. Jenny is happy to be sitting in the shade of two big trees while she plays. 
Jenny is in the sandbox. Jenny is playing with the cat. There is a red shovel in sandbox. 
Jenny is playing in the sandbox with a baseball. A sad cat is watching Jenny play with the ball. There is an apple tree next to them. 
The cat is sitting next to Jenny. Jenny is sitting in the sandbox. Jenny is scared of the snake. 
Jenny has a pirate hat on. A cat is in the sandbox. The bucket is full of sand. 
The cat has a hat on. Some fruit is in the tree. Jenny is in the sandbox. 
Jenny sits in the sanbox. Jenny says hi to the cat. Jenny tries to play with the cat. 
The sandbox is buy the apple tree. Jenny is sitting in the sandbox with a cat. Jenny is not playing with the balls. 
The cat is on the slide. Mike and Jenny like watching the cat play. Mike and Jenny are sitting in the grass. 
The cat is on the slide. Mike and Jenny are wearing glasses. Mike and Jenny are watching the cat. 
Mike and Jenny are sitting in the grass. Mike and Jenny are wearing sunglasses. The cat is sitting on the slide. 
Mike and Jenny sit under the apple tree. The cat likes to go down the slide. The tree is full of apples. 
The cat is at the top of the slide. Mike and Jenny are watching the cat. Mike and Jenny are sitting by the apple tree. 
Mike and Jenny look excited about something. The cat is sitting on top of the slide. The balloons floating in the air are pretty. 
Mike and Jenny are sitting in the grass. The cat is at the top of the slide. The apple tree is behind the swing set. 
The cat is at the top of the slide. Mike and Jenny are sitting at the slide. There is a soda beside Jenny. 
The cat is sitting on the top of the slide. Mike and Jenny laugh at the cat. The slide is near the tree. 
The cat is going to slide. Jenny and Mike are next to each other. The baseball is by Jenny. 
Mike and Jenny see a goose in the park. Jenny brought balloons and a sand pail to play with. Mike brought a soccer ball to play with. 
Mike is sitting by Jenny. The duck is holding the pail. Jenny is standing by the tree. 
The duck is trying to eat sand. Jenny is smiling at the duck. Mike doesn't want the duck to get sick. 
A pink shovel is on the ground. Mike and Jenny want the duck. A duck is looking at the pink pale. 
The helicopter is behind the cloud. The duck is by the kids. The bucket is red. 
Jenny wants to hold the duck. Mike is scare of the duck. There is a sandbox at the park. 
Mike and Jenny want the duck to play. The sand pale is pink. The duck is looking at the sand box. 
Mike is near jenny. Jenny is very happy. A duck is near mike. 
Mike is talking to the duck. Jenny has pizza in her hands. The pale is full of sand. 
Mike is standing next to Jenny. The duck wants his food The duck food is by the tree. 
The bear is wearing a pirate hat. The bear is wearing sunglasses. Mike is wearing a hat. 
The bear is looking at Mike and Jenny. Mike and Jenny are afraid of the bear. The bear is next to the campfire. 
Mike and Jenny make a fire. The bear is happy to play today. Mike and Jenny are scared of the bear. 
Mike and Jenny are beside the campfire. The bear is scaring Jenny. There is a helicopter in the sky. 
There is a hot-air balloon in the sky. Jenny and Mike don't notice the bear. The campfire is under the tree. 
A bear attacks Mike and Jenny. Jenny is scared and screams. Mike tries to fight the bear. 
The bear is growling. The bear is standing beside the campfire. Jenny and Mike are standing by the tree. 
The bear is trying to put out the fire. Mike wants to protect his fire from the bear. Jenny is worried that Mike might get hurt. 
The bear scared Mike. Mike is holding a hamburger. Jenny does not look happy. 
Scary Bear scares Mike and Jenny. Mike is scared of the bear. Jenny is happy to see the bear. 
Mike sat crossed legged watching Jenny. Jenny was wearing Mike's baseball hat. Jenny practiced kicking the football. 
The cat is sitting under the apple tree. Jenny is running away with the football. Mike is chasing Jenny. 
Mike kicks Jenny the football. Jenny is ready to catch the ball. A helicopter flies by. 
Jenny kicked the football to Mike. Mike is holding a tennis ball. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
The sun is in the sky. Jenny and Mike are kicking the football. The dog is watching Mike and Jenny play. 
Mike is kicking a football to Jenny. There are two trees. There is one cloud in the sky. 
Mike kicks the beach ball. Jenny wears sunglasses. Jenny is happy for the sunshine. 
Jenny is kicking the football. Mike is holding the basketball. Jenny has a tennis ball in her hand. 
An owl is sitting in the tree. A duck is sitting under the tree. Jenny and Mike are playing soccer. 
Jenny is kicking a soccer ball. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is happy. 
Mike jumped off the swings. Jenny has a bunch of balloons. Mike is wearing a cap. 
Jenny has a bunch of balloons. Mike is wearing a crown. Mike is next to the swings. 
Mike is happy to see Jenny. Jenny is holding four balloons. The pink bucket is in the sandbox. 
Jenny wants to share her balloons with Mike. Mike jump off the swing set. Mike was wearing his chefs hat. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very happy. Jenny is holding balloons. 
Jenny has a bunch of balloons. Jenny is happy to see Mike. Mike came to the park to play with Jenny. 
Jenny is holding some balloons. Mike is wearing a blue cap. Mike is by the swing set. 
Jenny is very happy. Jenny is holding a kite. Mike is sing in a swing. 
Mike is wearing sun glasses.. Mike is sitting on the swing. Jenny is holding the balloons. 
Jenny has four balloons. Mike is wearing a hat. Jenny sees Mike walking. 
Mike angrily holds the baseball in his hand. Jenny runs away with the baseball glove. Jenny runs in front of the tree. 
Mike is holding a base-ball. Jenny is holding a bat. Jenny is very surprised. 
Jenny put her sunglasses on the ground. There is a duck sitting in Jenny's lap. Mike is sad that Jenny isn't playing with him. 
Mike found the baseball. Jenny is surprised. Jenny has a baseball bat. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very happy. Mike is wearing a hat. 
jenny is near a tree. Jenny is next tp a base-ball. Mike is near a tree. 
Mike is holding a baseball. Jenny is holding a baseball bat. Jenny looks angrily at Mike. 
Mike throws the baseball. Jenny swings a bat. Jenny is sad. 
Mike is holding a ball. A cat is looking at Mike. An owl is looking at Jenny. 
Jenny is next to the tree. Mike has a baseball in his hand. Mike's hat is on sideways. 
Mike is holding a drink. A cat is sitting on the slide. The sun is shining. 
Jenny is wearing a hat with a star. Mike is wearing sunglasses. Mike is holding a red and white cup. 
Mike is running with a drink. Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. The cat is up in a tree. 
Mike is very happy. Mike is near a soccer-ball. mike is holding a soda-can. 
Jenny is riding on a toy. A basketball is sitting beside a toy. Mike is drinking a drink. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is sitting on the riding toy. Mike is running toward Jenny. 
Jenny is sitting on the toy. Mike is on the table. The cat sees the bird. 
Jenny is playing on the spring toy. Mike and Jenny are happy to see each other. Mike brought a soda to share with Jenny. 
Jenny is riding the bumblebee. Mike is running to Jenny. Mike is holding a soda. 
Jenny is very happy. A cloud is in the sky. Mike is quite angry. 
Mike likes the swings. Jenny is going to the slide. The beach ball is in the grass. 
Jenny is wearing a silly hat. Mike is wearing a baseball glove. There is a storm near by. 
Mike is sitting by the swing. Jenny is standing by the snake. Jenny is standing by the slide. 
Mike is wearing a pirate hat. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is holding the balloons. 
There is a snake next to Jenny. Mike is playing with a rocket. Mike and Jenny are sittng in the grass. 
Mike has climbed to the top of the swings. Jenny likes jumping over the slide. Mike is afraid he is going to fall. 
Jenny is jumping into the sandbox. There is a bucket in the sandbox. Mike is standing on the table. 
A bear has jumped out and scared Mike and Jenny. Jenny is so frightened that she has fallen over. Mike is playing catch with the bear. 
Mke is standing Jenny. The cat is sitting by Mike. The balloon is flying in the sky. 
Jenny is throwing the ball to Mike. There is air balloon in the sky. There is a picnic table next to Mike. 
Mike is flying a kite. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. The cat is sitting by Mike. 
Mike is flying a kite Jenny is in front of an apple tree There's a cat in front of Mike 
Mike is wearing a pirate hat. The cat is sitting beside Mike. Mike is flying a kite. 
Mike is flying a kite. Jenny is happy to see Mike. The cat came to the park to play. 
Mike is flying a kite. Jenny is holding a baseball. The cat is standing next to Mike. 
Jenny is wearing a silly hat. Mike and Jenny are playing catch. The kite is flying high in the sky. 
Mike is flying a kite. Jenny is wearing a hat. Jenny sees a cat beside of Mike. 
Jenny is throwing the baseball to mike. Mike is flying a kite. The cat is sitting next to Mike. 
Mike is flying a colorful kite. The cat is sitting by Mike. Jenny is playing with a baseball. 
Jenny has a baseball. Mike has a kite. A cat is near Mike. 
Jenny is playing on the slide. Jenny is wearing a funny hat. Mike's hat has horns. 
Mike is climbing the slide. Jenny filled a bucket with sand. Jenny is sitting in the sandbox. 
Mike is wearing a hat Jenny is waving at Mike Mike is about to climb the slide 
Mike is playing on the slide. Jenny is wearing a hat. The sun is in the sky. 
Mike is wearing a blue cap. Jenny is holding out the soccer ball. Mike is next to the pink slide. 
Mike is going to go down the pink slide. The cat is sitting beside the tree. Jenny is drinking a soda. 
Mike is wearing a knitted hat. Jenny is climbing up the slide. The sun is hiding behind the tree. 
Jenny is at the top of the slide. Mike is holding an owl. Mike is not happy. 
Mike is climbing up the slide. Jenny is sitting down with sunglasses on. It's a bright sunny day. 
Mike is walking away  because he is angry. Jenny fell off the slide. Mike and Jenny are at the park. 
Mike offers Jenny a hamburger. Jenny smiles and runs to Mike to take the hamburger. Mike cooked hamburgers on a grill. 
Jenny has a silly hat. Mike is making a hamburger. The hamburger is done cooking. 
Mike made Jenny a hamburger. There is a pink shovel in the sandbox. Jenny is really happy. 
Mike has a hamburger. Jenny is happy to see Mike today. There is a red and yellow hot air ballon in the air. 
The boy is holding a hot dog. The girl is holding a hamburger. The girl is running. 
Mike has a hamburger. Jenny is next to the slide. Jenny wants  a hamburger. 
Mike is not happy. jenny is very happy. jenny is near a grill. 
Jenny is wearing a ball cap. Mike is cooking hamburgers. Mike is happy to see a hot air balloon. 
Mike is going into the sandbox. Jenny wants to share her burger with Mike. A rocket ship is over Jenny's head. 
Mike is cooking hamburgers. Jenny is very hungry. Jenny runs to grab her lunch. 
Mike has started a fire with magic Jenny says put the fire out Jenny says she will burn the frisbee if he doesn't 
Mike jumped up when he saw a helicopter. Jenny sat to close the the fire. Jenny almost burned her hand on the fire. 
Mike made a campfire. Mike and Jenny wear hats. Jenny is scared of the lightening. 
Jenny slips and falls next to the campfire. Mike conjures a fire in front of him. A baseball bat and glove lay together. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Jenny is standing by the fire. Mike is standing by the fire. 
Mike made a campfire. Jenny is worried the fire is too big. Mike is wearing a witch hat. 
Mike is near a fire. jenny is near mike Jenny is sitting in the grass. 
Mike wore his blue wizards hat. Jenny wants to wear the blue wizards hat. Mike jumped off the ground by the fire. 
Jenny is sad because the ballons are floating away. The camp fire is in the grill. Mike is wearing a witch hat. 
Mike made a campfire. Jenny is worried about the campfire. Mike is wearing a witch hat. 
Jenny showed the cat the slide. Mike wanted the cat to slide down the slide. Jenny was looking for the baseball. 
The cat is watching Mike run to Jenny. Jenny is waiting for Mike to arrive. Mike and Jenny are playing by the slide. 
Mike is wearing a viking hat. A cat is sitting between Mike and Jenny. An owl is sitting in the tree. 
Mike and Jenny are looking at the cat. The football is next to the picnic table. The cat is orange. 
Mike and Jenny are playing with a frisbee. An orange cat is watching Mike and Jenny play. A man in a hot air balloon waves at Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny is calling the cat to her. Mike is holding a green tennis ball. The hot air ballon is flying high. 
Mike has a basketball. A cloud is in the sky. Jenny wants the basketball. 
Jenny has a hamburger. Mike is wearing horns on his head. The cat is sitting on the grass. 
Mike dropped the tennis ball. Jenny is happy to see Mike. The cat is watching Jenny. 
jenny is very happy. Mike is shock. A cat is near mike. 
Jenny sees a rocketship in the sky. An owl is perched in the cherry tree. Jenny and Mike are running. 
Mike is very happy. jenny is wearing a hat. Mike is near jenny. 
Jenny is running away from Mike. Mike likes to play soccer. Mike's rocketship is going into space. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The rocket flew away from Jenny and Mike. Jenny is running towards the rocket. 
Mike and Jenny are chasing the rocket. Jenny wants to catch the duck. The duck is under the small tree. 
Jenny and Mike are chasing the rocket. Mike is running with a soda in his hands. Jenny and Mike are running through the park. 
Jenny is waving to Mike. The slide is beside the sandbox. The riding toy is beside the apple tree. 
Jenny is holding a tennis ball. Mike is holding a baseball mitt. A rocket ship is flying in the sky. 
Mike is behind jenny. Jenny is running from mike. mike is wearing blue. 
Mike and Jenny are in front of the slide. There is a rocket in the air. Jenny is wearing a colorful hat. 
Jenny is worried she will not catch the ball. Mike is angry. The airplane is going to fly into the cloud. 
Mike is wearing purple sunglasses. Mike is throwing a soccer ball. Jenny is trying to catch the soccer ball. 
Mike and Jenny are playing soccer together in the park. Mike is wearing a silly  colorful hat. Mike and Jenny are happy to see a big plane fly by. 
Mike is kicking a soccer ball. Mike is standing next to an apple tree. A plane is flying overhead. 
Mike is wearing a chef hat. Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. Jenny is kicking the soccer ball. 
A duck joins Jenny and Mike. Mike and Jenny are playing soccer. Jenny runs after the soccer ball. 
There are red apples in a tree. An airplane flies overhead. Mike is playing with a soccer ball. 
There are toys in the sandbox. Mike kicked the soccer ball. Jenny has fun playing with Mike at the park. 
Jenny is kicking the soccer ball. Mike likes to play soccer. Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. 
Mike is kicking the ball. The plane is flying in the sky. Jenny is scared of the snake. 
The table is under the tree. The mustard bottle is on the table. A kite is in the sky. 
Mike is alone at the park. He sings a song to his pets. The dog and cat like his song. 
Mike is standing by the dog. Mike is holding his hands out to the cat. A plane is flying in the sky. 
The sun is in the sky. Nobody is on the swings. A dog is near a cat. 
Mike looks happy or play with the dog. There is a dog and cat. There is a slid behind Mike. 
Red apples grow on the tree. Mike is happy to see the orange cat. The orange cat watches Mike. 
Mike and Jenny are at the playground. Mike and Jenny are happy. Jenny's cat is sitting on the table. 
The bumblebee is too small for Mike to play on. The dog is near Mike. Mike is wearing a baseball glove. 
Mike is standing next to the dog. The balloon is flying in the sky. The air plane is flying in the sky. 
Mike wants the cat to come to him. The dog is looking at the cat. Mike's hat has a star on it. 
Mike wants Jenny to swing with him. Jenny is afraid of dropping the pie. Jenny is standing by the picnic table. 
Mike is swinging on the swing set. There is a pie on the table. Mike is wearing a hat. 
The hot air ballon is red and yellow. Mike is swinging on the swingset. There is pie and soda on the picnic table. 
There is a pie on the table. Mike is playing on the swing set. The airplane is flying overhead. 
Mike is wearing a hat. A pie and a drink are on the table. Mike is swinging on the swings. 
Mike is playing on the swings. Jenny is holding a pie on the table. She has balloons ready for a party. 
Mike is sitting behind the swing set. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. The pie is on the picnic table. 
Mike is swinging on the swings. There is pie on the picnic table. The table is under the tree. 
Jenny kicked the ball. Mike is on the swing. The big pie is on the table. 
Mike is swinging. Jenny has brought a pie. Jenny is happy to see Mike. 
Jenny made a pie for the bear. Mike is wearing sunglasses. The bear is happy to see Mike. 
The bear is wearing a pirate hat. Mike and Jenny are laughing at the bear. The bear is not scaring Mike and Jenny. 
A bear is wearing a hat. A bear is holding a tennis racket. A bear is growling at Jenny and Mike. 
Mike is holding the hot dog. Jenny is holding the pie. The bear is scaring Jenny and Mike. 
Jenny is holding both arms up. The bear is holding both arms up. Mike is holding one arm up. 
The bear was beside the tent. Jenny showed the bear the pie on the table. Mike waved to the bear who was next to the table. 
Jenny is holding a hotdog. Mike is holding a pie. The bear is growling at Jenny. 
Mike is holding the pie. Jenny has a hotball. The bear has the bat. 
Mike is sitting by the pie. Jenny is scared of the bear. The bear is standing by Jenny. 
Jenny is holding a pie. There is a bear at the park today. Mike has four ballons. 
The snake wants to go into the tent. Mike is trying to catch the snake. Jenny is afraid of the snake. 
Mike and Jenny see a snake going into their tent The snake wants to take a little nap Mike and Jenny don't want to nap with a snake 
Mike is running to the tent. Jenny is sitting on the grass. A helicopter is flying by. 
Mike and Jenny are camping. A helicopter is nearby. There is a snake by the tent. 
A snake is crawling towards the tent. A helicopter flies overhead. Mike and Jenny look worried by the snake. 
Mike and Jenny are running from the snake. The snake is crawling into the tent. The helicopter is flying by. 
The snake is entering the tent. There is a helicopter above the tent. Mike and Jenny look shocked. 
Jenny is afraid of the snake. Mike is motioning the helicopter. The snake is green 
Mike is near a green snake. Jenny is near a tent. Mike is near jenny. 
Jenny is afraid of the snake. The snake is going into the tent. Mike is worried about Jenny. 
Jenny is flying a kite Mike thinks the kite is his and feels angry Jenny tells him she bought a kite just like his because she liked it 
Jenny is flying a kite. A frisbee and baseball are on the ground. Mike is wearing a hat. 
Jenny is flying a kite. Jenny is next to the tree. Mike is sitting with a baseball mitt and ball. 
Jenny likes to fly kites. Mike is jumping up and down for joy. The helicopter is flying above the trees. 
Jenny is flying a kite. Mike is wearing a hat. They are near the forest. 
Mike is sitting on the ground. Jenny has a kite. The cat is under the tree. 
A helicopter has flown out from behind the tree. Mike sitting in the sandbox. Jenny is flying a kite. 
Jenny is flying a kite. Mike is worried the kit is going to crash. There is ketchup on the picnic table. 
Mike is near a swing-set. Jenny is standing on a swing-set. Mike is really worried. 
Mike is mad because he wants the kite. Jenny is flying the kite. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. 
The owl is standing by a hot dog. Mike is mad at the owl on the table. Jenny wants the owl to leave. 
An owl is sitting on a table. Jenny and Mike have their hands in the air. Mike is wearing a hat. 
An owl is sitting on the grill. Mike and Jenny are mad at the owl. The owl is taking a hot dog. 
The owl is sitting on the barbecue. A hamburger is on the picnic table. Jenny and mike are jumping next to the barbecue. 
Mike was sad the owl at ruined their picnic. Jenny tried to scare away the owl. The owl came to tell Jenny that Mike had to go away. 
Mike is near a table. A owl is on a table. A burger is on  table. 
The owl is on the hamburger. The hamburger is on the grill. There is a ketchup bottle on the table. 
Jenny is sad that the hot dogs are not ready. Mike is trying to scare the owl out of the tree. Mike has on a chef hat. 
Jenny is very sad. Jenny is wearing a crown. A owl is sitting on a table. 
There is a helicopter in the sky. An owl is sitting on the grill. Mike and Jenny are jumping up and down. 
Mike is wearing pink. Jenny is playing with a soccer ball. Mike is wearing blue shoes. 
Jenny and Mike are playing soccer. An owl is in the apple tree. The mustard and ketchup are on the table. 
Mike is wearing black sunglasses. Jenny is wearing purple sunglasses. Jenny is kicking the ball to Mike. 
Jenny and Mike are wearing sunglasses. Jenny has kicked the soccer ball. The dog watches Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny and Mike are playing soccer. Jenny and Mike are wearing sunglasses. There is one cloud in the sky. 
Mike and Jenny play soccer. Jenny has glasses on. A balloon is in the sky. 
Mike and Jenny are playing ball. Jenny is wearing purple glasses. Mike is wearing his sunglasses. 
Mike is wearing black shades. Jenny is near a cat A cat is wearing a blue collar. 
Jenny and Mike are playing soccer. Jenny and Mike are wearing sunglasses. A hot air balloon is in the sky. 
There is an air plane in the sky. Mike is kicking the soccer ball to Jenny. Jenny is wearing purple sunglasses today. 
Mike is wearing a blue cap with a white star. It is raining at the park today. There is an owl sitting on the soccer ball. 
mike is very happy. mike is sitting in the grass. mike has on a blue hat. 
There is a raincloud in the sky. The owl is sitting on a soccer ball. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. 
Rain is pouring on the owl. The owl likes to play soccer. Mike is sitting on the ground. 
The owl is on the soccer ball. Mike is wearing glasses. Mike is sitting in the rain. 
An owl is standing on a soccer ball Mike is waving at the owl Mike is wearing a funny hat 
It is raining. Mike is smiling at an owl. The owl is sitting on a ball. 
An owl is sitting on the soccer ball. Mike is smiling at the owl. There are two trees. 
Mike is telling stories to the owl. The owl is sitting on Mike's soccer ball. It is going to rain in the park. 
Mike is sitting under a tree. The owl is sitting on a soccer ball. Mike is wearing a blue hat. 
Mike is kicking the soccer ball to Jenny. Jenny is wearing sunglasses while she plays. A balloon is flying overhead. 
A balloon is in the sky. Jenny is playing with the soccer ball. Mike is kicking his leg. 
Jenny and Mike are playing soccer. Rain is coming out of the cloud. The swingset is by the big tree. 
The owl is on the top of the swing set. Mike kicked the soccer ball. Jenny is running to kick the ball back to Mike. 
Mike and Jenny kick the soccer ball. Jenny wears black glasses. The ball is under the swings. 
Mike is wearing shades. jenny is very happy. Mike is very happy. 
Jenny is playing with the soccer ball. There is no one on the swings. There is a pizza on the ground. 
Mike and Jenny are playing soccer. The soccer is between the swings. The sun is in the sky. 
Mike kicked a soccer ball. There is a football near the swingset. Jenny was waiting to catch the ball. 
Mike and Jenny are kicking a ball back and forth. The mustard is in the grass. The tennis ball is in the grass. 
Mike and Jenny are wearing hats. Mike and Jenny are playing ball. The tree has apples on it. 
Mike is wearing a baseball mitt. Mike is wearing purple sunglasses. The cat is watching Jenny. 
Mike is mad because he wants the ball. The ball is in the tree. There is a plane in the sky. 
Mike is trying to catch the ball. Jenny is near the tennis ball and baseball. The dog is near the owl. 
Jenny is in fron of a tree Mike is in front of Jenny Jenny throws the baseball to Mike 
Jenny wants to catch the ball. There is a green snake next to Jenny. Jenny and Mike have an orange Frisbee. 
Mike and Jenny are wearing hats. Mike is throwing the basketball. The cat is watching Mike. 
Mike wants to catch the tennis ball. The cat is on the bee toy. It is a sunny day. 
Mike is angry that he missed the ball. Mike is holding a tennis racquet. Jenny threw the ball to Mike. 
Jenny is happy playing in the park. Mike is mad that he hit the ball to hard. Mike has a tennis racket. 
The duck is by the tent. Mike has a bat. Jenny is catching the ball. 
Mike is going to play baseball. A goose is in the park. Mike is meeting Jenny at the park later. 
Mike is very surprise. A duck is near mike. Mike is wearing blue. 
Mike and Jenny are playing baseball. Mike is holding the bat. The duck is looking at Mike. 
Mike is holding the bat. Mike is playing baseball. The baseball is on the ground. 
Mike is holding a bat. A duck is near mike. Mike is holding a baseball. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Mike is holding the bat. The duck is standing by Mike. 
Jenny is playing baseball with Mike. Mike has a baseball bat. The duck is walking to Mike. 
Mike tripped on a duck. Jenny throws the ball to Mike. Mike is sad he missed the ball. 
Mike is holding the bat. The balloon is flying in the sky. The duck is standing by Mike. 
The thundercloud is above Jenny Mike is sitting on the table Mike is wearing a blue hat 
Jenny becomes angry at Mike. A dog becomes Jenny's friend. Mike wears sunglasses because the sun is bright. 
Mike is holding the ball. Mike is wearing the hat. Jenny is sad because she wants the ball. 
Jenny is near an apple tree. Jenny looks very angry. Mike is wearing a blue hat. 
Mike is holding a glove. Jenny is wearing pink. Mike is wearing blue. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is wearing a funny hat. Jenny is holding ketchup. 
Mike is kicking the football. Jenny is flying the kite. The dog is watching Mike play. 
Mike is kicking the football. Jenny does not want to play football with Mike. Mike is wearing sunglasses because the sun is bright. 
Jenny is angry that Mike would rather sit on the ground than play with her. Mike is wearing sunglasses and a hat that is far too warm for such a sunny day. Mike's dog loves to go to the park when it is sunny. 
Mike is wearing a funny hat. Jenny is wearing a blue hat. Jenny looks angry at Mike. 
Mike is in the sandbox. The owl is in the apple tree. Jenny kicked the soccer ball into the sandbox. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Mike is in the sandbox. A soccer ball is in the sandbox. 
Mike is sitting in a sand-box. Jenny is near a sand-box. A soccer ball is in a sand-box. 
Jenny is outside of the sandbox. Mike is sitting in the sandbox. The pail is full of sand. 
Mike is sitting in the sand box. An airplane is in the sky. Mike is sad because he wants the soccer ball. 
Jenny kicked the soccer ball into the sandbox. The soccer ball knocked over the sand castle. Mike is mad the soccer ball is in the sandbox. 
Jenny kicks the soccer ball. Mike is sad. Apples grow on the tree. 
Mike is in the sandbox. Jenny kicked the ball to Mike. The ball rolled into the sandbox. 
Jenny is very upset. Mike is in a sand-box. Mike is near soccer. 
Mike is sitting in the sandbox. Jenny kicked the ball into the sandbox. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike and Jenny jump for joy. There is a hamburger on the picnic table. The cat is sitting next to Mike. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is really happy. Jenny is wearing a colorful hat. 
A hot-air balloon flies overhead. Jenny is wearing a pirate cap. Mike is wearing a Viking hat and purple glasses. 
There is rain in the sky. Someone is riding in a hot air balloon. A basketball is sitting in the grass. 
Mike is wearing a baseball cap. The frisbee is in the grass. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
Mike likes the sun. Jenny likes the rain. They like the ballon. 
A hot air balloon is flying. The sun is yellow. Mike is on his tip toes. 
There is a single cloud in the sky. Jenny and Mike are waving to the duck. The cat is watching Jenny and Mike. 
Jenny is waving to the hot air balloon. Mike is wearing a hat. Jenny is wearing a Viking hat. 
Jenny wears a blue cap. Mike is happy to see Jenny. Mike waves to the hot air balloon. 
Jenny is sitting by Mike. Mike is holding the hot dog. The balloons are sitting on the snake. 
The snake has the balloons. Mike has a pie and a hotdog. Jenny waves at the snake. 
Jenny is waving at the snake. Mike is holding a hot dog. The snake has four balloons. 
Jenny is pretending to be a witch. Mike is eating a hot dog. The snake is using balloons to float. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very happy. Jenny is wearing a hat. 
The snake is tied to some balloons. Mike and Jenny are happy. The hot dog is next to the pie. 
The snake is wearing balloons. A ball is beside the tree. Mike and Jenny are wearing hats. 
The snake is floating away with the balloons. The pie and hotdog are on the yellow picnic table. Jenny is wearing a purple witch's hat. 
Jenny is wearing a wizard hat. Mike and Jenny are happy. Mike is holding a hot dog. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is sitting in the grass. The snack is holding the balloons. 
Mike is very surprised. Jenny is really happy. It is raining near Jenny. 
There is an airplane flying by. Mike is watching Jenny. Jenny is jumping in the air. 
Mike is in the sandbox Jenny is in the sandbox A airplane is flying behind Mike and Jenny 
Jenny was doing jumping jacks. Mike sat and watch the airplane. The cloud had lighting and it scared the owl. 
The table is behind the apple tree. Jenny is yelling for Mike. Mike does not want it to rain. 
The lightning is hitting the airplane. The dog is under the tree. Mike watches Jenny jump. 
A duck is eating a hamburger. A plane is struck by lightning. Jenny cheers for Mike who is meditating. 
Mike is sitting in the sandbox An airplane gets hit by lightning Mike is afraid of the fire 
Mike is very surprised. Jenny is very happy. Jenny is jumping in the air. 
Mike is flying a kite. Mike is wearing a police hat. The plane is flying away. 
A duck is on Mike's head. A cloud is in the sky. Some fruit is on the tree. 
Mike is mad There is a duck on Mikes Head There is a apple tree behind Jenny 
Mike is very sad. Jenny is very happy. Jenny has on a blue hat. 
Mike has a funny look on his face. There is a duck on Mike's head. Jenny is about to catch the soccer ball. 
Mike is angry at the duck. The duck is standing on Mike's head. Jenny is standing by the apple tree. 
A bird is on Mike's head. Rain is falling from the sky. Jenny is wearing a blue hat. 
Mike is angry over the duck on his head. Jenny tries to get the duck to jump to her. Apples grow on the tree. 
Mike is not amused with the duck on his head. Queen Jenny is quite pleased with the duck. An air plane is flying over Mike and Jenny's head. 
Mike is not happy the goose is on his head. Mike worries his dog will chase the goose. Jenny laughs at the goose on Mike's head. 
MIke is angry The duck is on Mikes head There is a tennis ball between mike and jenny 
Mike is enjoying a game of kickball slide. As a airplane hovers pass him  Mike is forever thrilled to be part of the game of kickball slide. Mike is patiently waiting as the ball comes near him during an outing of kickball slide. 
Mike is on a slide. Mike is near a basket-ball. Mike is near a beach-ball. 
Mike is on the slide Mike is happy Mike is wearing a hat 
Mike is climbing the slide. The soccer ball is in front of the slide. Mike is wearing a winter hat. 
Mike should not stand on top of the slide. Mike has Autism and is trying to climb to the hot air balloon in the sky. Mike should not be alone while he plays. 
Mike is playing on the slide. Mike is smiling at the snake. The snake is under the tree. 
Mike is wearing the glove. Mike is standing next to the tree. Mike is throwing the ball. 
Mike is going down the slide. Jenny is holding a baseball mitt. A baseball is at the foot of the slide. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Mike is scared to slide down. The dog wants Mike's ball. 
Mike is getting ready to slide. A baseball is at the bottom of the slide. It is a cloudy day. 
Jenny is very happy. Mike is very happy. Mike is holding a burger. 
Jenny is sitting on the slide. Mike is playing in the sandbox. Mike wants to give Jenny a hamburger. 
Mike has on a pirate hat. Jenny is at the top of the slide. The sun is shining brightly today. 
Jenny is coming down the slide. Mike has a hamburger. The picnic table is bright yellow. 
Jenny is playing on the slide. Mike offers Jenny a hamburger. Jenny brought her pail and shovel to the park. 
Jenny is going down the slide. Mike is going to eat a hamburger. Mike is wearing a blue baseball cap. 
Jenny loves to go down the slide. Mike is holding a hamburger. A cat sits by the slide. 
Mike has a hamburger. Jenny is at the top of the slide. Mike has a bottle of mustard. 
Jenny is at the top of the slide. Mike is holding a hamburger. There sky is cloudy. 
Mike is wearing a pirate hat. Mike is holding a hamburger. Jenny is sliding down a slide. 
It is raining in the park. The goose stays under the table. The snake will stay dry under the apple tree. 
The snake is under the tree. The helicopter is flying. It is raining by the apple tree. 
The snake is under the table. The duck is under the table. The tableis next to the tree. 
The snake and duck sit under the tree. Rain falls from the sky. Red apples grow on the tree. 
The cloud is raining water. The duck is following the snake. The tree has apples growing on it. 
The snake and the duck are under the tree. There are six red apples on the tree. It is raining at the park today. 
There's a apple tree near a Duck. There's a duck in the grass. There's a green snake in the grass. 
The snake is by the tree. The duck is by the tree. The ball is in the sand box. 
The cloud is raining The tree has apples in it The duck is going into the tent 
Both duck and snake hide under the table. A giant apple tree stands behind the table. Clouds drop rain and lightning behind the trees. 
Jenny is holding four balloons. Mike is meditating by the slide. A helicopter is above the slide. 
Mike is at the bottom of the slide. The hot air balloon is in the sky. There is a helicopter in the sky. 
Mike is at the top of the slide. Jenny just slid down the slide. The owl is watching from the tree. 
Mike is about to play on the slide Jenny is running from the slide Jenny is wearing a funny hat 
Mike is on the slide. jenny is next to a yellow table. There is a pie on a yellow table. 
Mike is ready to go down the slide. Jenny is waiting for Mike. A dog is watching Mike and Jenny 
Jenny is going down the slide. Mike is cheering for Jenny. Mike and Jenny like to play. 
Jenny and Mike have balloons. Mike and Jenny are standing by the slide. A plane is in the sky. 
Mike and jenny are playing with a dog Mike is standing next to a sandbox Mike and Jenny are both happy 
Mike loves to play on the slide. Jenny is waiting to catch Mike. There is a glass on the picnic table. 
The airplane is flying in the sky. Jenny holds the soccer ball. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. 
Jenny is playing soccer Mike is angry Jenny is not playing with him The owl is in the tree 
Mr. Snake sneaks by. Jenny and Mike fight. Jenny takes the ball form Mike. 
Jenny is going to kick the soccer ball. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is standing by the apple tree. 
The cat is sitting by Mike. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is not happy because he wants the ball. 
Mike is mad because he wants the ball. Jenny is wearing a crown with red and blue gems. Mike is wearing a red and grey snow hat. 
Jenny holds the soccer ball and looks surprised. Mike is looking angrily at Jenny. The dog watches Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing a crown on her head. Mike and Jenny are angry. A soccer ball is on the ground next to Jenny. 
Jenny is holding the ball. Mike is mad because he wants to play with the ball. The owl is in the tree. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Mike is sitting on the ground. The owl is perched in the tree. 
Mike is wearing a cooking hat Mike is cooking Mike has the ketchup 
Mike is standing next to a barbecue. A small ball is in the sandbox. The sun is out. 
Mike waves to the helicopter. Jenny forgot her soccer ball. Next Mike go on the swings. 
Mike is holding a hot dog. Mike is waving at the helicopter. Mike is standing far away from the grill. 
Mike wanted to eat pizza. The ketchup sat next to the pizza on the grill. Mike jumped high in the air. 
Mike is happy to grill. Mike is happy it is sunny out. Mike sees ketchup to use on hot dogs. 
Mike is jumping. Mike is cooking hamburgers. The dog is looking at the duck. 
Mike is holding the mustard. The sun is shinning. Mike is cooking on the pit. 
Mike is wearing the sun glasses. The dog is standing by the pit. Mike is holding the ketchup. 
Mike is wearing a warm hat. Mike is happy to find the mustard and ketchup. The big sun is bright in the sky. 
A bear is chasing away Jenny and Mike. They have left a pie by the campfire. The campfire is by the tree. 
A bear scares Mike and Jenny. There is a fire in front of the tent. Jenny is wearing a pink outfit. 
The bear is next to the barbecue. Jenny is acting like a bear. Mike is next to the tent. 
Jenny and Mike are running from the bear. The bear is standing at the tent. There is a campfire made. 
jenny is very happy. Mike is very surprise. There is a burger on the grass. 
Mike is surprised at jenny. Jenny is very sad. A bear is near a fire. 
A bear chases Mike and Jenny. Jenny is scared of the bear. Mike runs away quickly. 
The apple tree is behind the bear. The bear is roaring by a fire. Mike is running to Jenny. 
The bear scared Mike and Jenny. The basketball does not go with the racket. The fire Mikes mom built is warm. 
The bear is scaring Mike and Jenny. The table is next to the camp fire. There is a cloud in the sky. 
The cat is sitting in a the tree. There is a storm in the sky. Jenny's shoes are black. 
Mike sees a snake. Jenny sees the cat in a tree. The cat sees the lightning. 
There is a cat in the tree. Jenny is wearing a hat. Jenny is afraid of the lightning. 
The cat has climbed into the tree. Mike is pretending to be a pirate. Jenny calls for help when she sees lightening. 
Jenny is near a tent. Jenny is very surprised. Jenny is wearing pink. 
Jenny tells the cat to get out of the tree. Jenny tells the cat it is time to go home. Jenny tells the cat a storm is coming. 
Mike is wearing sun glasses. The cat is on the tree. Mike is holdng the frisbee. 
The cat is in the tree. It is lightening. Jenny is standing by the sandbox. 
Jenny is near a tree Jenny is wearing pink. There is a bucket on the grass. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. The cat is sitting on the tree. Jenny is scared of the lightening. 
Mike is holding a cola Jenny is holding a frisbee Mike is wearing a spinny hat 
Jenny is near a green snake. Mike is near a soccer-ball. Jenny is near a beach-ball. 
Rain fell on Mike. Jenny played with the toy rocket ship. The owl sat on Jenny's hat. 
Jenny is standing near the apple tree. Mike is sitting on the grass. Jenny has an orange Frisbee. 
Mike is kicking the ball. Jenny is catching teh ball. The helicopter is flying in the sky. 
Jenny is mad at Mike. It is raining. Jenny is holding a baseball bat. 
Jenny wants to play on the swings. Jenny is made at Mike. Mike wants to eat cherry pie. 
Mike wants to throw the frisbee to Jenny. Jenny is mad at Mike and doesn't want to play. The slide is near the apple tree. 
Mike is sad because he doesn't have a ball. Jenny is playing frisbee alone. Mike is under the apple tree. 
Jenny has a hat on. Mike is sitting down. A cloud is in the sky. 
Mike is near jenny. Jenny is very happy. A dog is near a grill. 
Mike is calling the cat to come to him. Jenny is jumping in the air. Jenny has mustard for the hot dogs. 
Jenny is holding the mustard. Mike is looking at the grill. Jenny is standing near the table. 
A helicopter is flying above Mike and Jenny. There is an apple tree near Mike and Jenny. The dog is closest to Mike. 
Mike is wearing a winter cap. Jenny is excited about the barbecue. A plane flies overhead. 
Jenny is near a grill. Mike is cooking- hot-dogs. Mike is near a tent. 
mike is very angry Jenny has a attitude. Jenny has on the color pink. 
Jenny is jumping up and down. Mike is very happy. Catsup and mustard are on the picnic table. 
Jenny is making burgers. The fire is by the tent. Mike wants a hamburger. 
Mike is grilling a hamburger. Jenny is excited to eat the hamburger. Mike is upset there is only one burger. 
An airplane is flying above Mike and Jenny. Jenny is flying a kite. Mike is cheering Jenny on. 
Mike is flying a kite. Jenny is jumping for joy. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike is flying a colorful kite. Jenny is playing with a ball. The airplane will not disturb them. 
Mike is holding a kite. Jenny is very happy. Mike is very happy. 
Jenny is flying a kite. Mike is sitting on the ground. Mike is wearing a viking hat. 
Mike and Jenny are waving to an airplane Jenny is holding a kite Mike throws a  beach ball at the airplane 
Jenny is flying a kite. Mike is playing with a beach ball. An airplane is in the sky. 
Mike is wearing goggles. Mike has a kite. There is a plane in the sky. 
Mike is flying a kite. Jenny is throwing a ball. There is an airplane in the sky. 
Jenny is holding the kite. Mike is throwing the ball. The plane is flying in the sky. 
Mike is playing with a basketball. There is a bear behind Jenny. Jenny is holding sunglasses. 
Mike and Jenny are happy. The bear is happy to play. The bear is wearing a hat. 
Jenny and Mike are playing catch in the park. Mike is shocked to see the bear there. It is a nice sunny day at the park today. 
Mike and Jenny say hello to the bear. Mike kicked the soccer ball. Jenny put her beach ball on the grass. 
The bear is playing with Jenny and Mike. Mike has a football. Jenny has cool glasses on. 
Jenny and Mike are playing with a bear. The bear is holding a tennis racquet. Mike is wearing sunglasses. 
The bear wants to play ball with Mike and Jenny. Mike is wearing a mitt. Jenny wants to catch the ball. 
A bear is trying to scare Mike. The dog is watching. Jenny has a tennis ball. 
Jenny laughingly kicks the ball at the bear. The bear screams in surprise at the cat. Mike is surprised to see a bear shouting. 
Mike is holding the bat. Jenny has the mitt. The bear is holding his arms up. 
Jenny and Mike are playing catch. Jenny is angry the ballons are going to fly away. The rocket soars in the sky. 
Jenny wants the baseball Mike is wearing a toboggin There's a rocket above Mike 
Mike is holding a baseball bat. Jenny is running with a baseball. A rocket ship is flying. 
Jenny and Mike play with the baseball A rocket flies over Mike Mike is standing next to the tree 
There are apples on the tree Jenny is throwing the baseball to Mike Mike is holding three balloons. 
A rocket zooms by. Jenny wants to play baseball. Mike is ready to catch the ball. 
A rocket and balloons are in the sky. Jenny is holding a baseball. Mike is jumping up and down. 
A rocket blasts off above Mike and Jenny. Four balloons float in front of the tree. Jenny happily kicks the grass. 
Jenny has four balloons. Mike kicks the football to Jenny. Jenny is happy to see a rocket. 
Jenny has new glasses. Mike threw the ball to Jenny. A rocketship flew over the park. 
A rocket is in the sky. A cat is on a swing. Mike is quite happy. 
Mike is holding a tennis racquet. A pale of sand is on the picnic table. The space ship is flying in the sky. 
The rocket is flying away. Mike is wearing a pirate hat. Mike is excited about the flying rocket. 
Jenny is at the top of the slide. Mike is cheering Jenny on. A rocket is blasting off in the sky. 
Mike is standing in a sand-box. There is a basket-ball near mike. There is a soccer ball near mike. 
Mike is happy to see the sandbox. The bucket and shovel are in the sandbox. The rocket blasts into the air! 
Mike is watching the rocket fly away. The rocket is flying away. Mike is standing by the swing. 
A rocket is in the sky. Mike is happy to see Jenny. Jenny had a bucket of sand. 
A ball and bat are by the picnic table. The dog is watching Mike. A rocket is taking off overhead. 
Mike is jumping up and down. There is a rocket ship. There is an apple tree. 
Mike is standing by the bear. The bear is wearing the hat. The fire is by the tree. 
Mike is near jenny. A bear is near mike. Mike is wearing blue shoes. 
The bear is scaring Jenny. Mike is pretending to be a bear. The bear is wearing a wizard hat. 
Mike and the bear play. Jenny is sad there is lightening. The bear wears a blue hat. 
Lightning strikes above Jenny. A giant bear screams at Mike and Jenny. Mike jumps in the air laughingly. 
Lightning is striking overhead. Jenny doesn't see the bear. The bear is wearing a witch's hat. 
The bear is scaring Jenny. The bear is wearing a witch hat. There is lightning in the sky. 
The bear is wearing a wizard hat Jenny and Mike have their hands in the air There is a beach ball in front of Jenny and Mike 
Mike is happy Jenny brought pie for lunch. Jenny is scared of the bear. The bear stole Jenny's hat. 
Mike is wearing the glasses. The bear is wearing the hat. Jenny is scared of the bear. 
There is a snake behind the tree Mike is kicking the soccer ball Jenny is going to catch the ball 
Jenny is wearing purple glasses. Mike is kicking the ball to Jenny. Mike is wearing a blue baseball cap. 
Jenny is wearing sun glasses. Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is wearing the hat. 
Mike is kicking a soccer-ball. Mike has a blue hat on. Jenny is very sad. 
Mike is very mad. jenny is very happy. Mike is near jenny. 
Jenny is wearing a crown on her head. Mike kicks around a soccer ball. The sun shines in the sky. 
Mike is kicking the ball. Mike is wearing the hat. Jenny is holding the pail. 
Mike and Jenny are playing soccer. Mike is wearing purple sunglasses. It is a nice day at the park. 
Jenny is kicking the soccer ball. Mike is wearing a blue shirt. There is a cloud in the sky. 
Mike is kicking the ball. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The sun is behind the clouds. 
Jenny has a football. Mike and Jenny are waving. Mike is wearing shorts. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very happy. Jenny is playing with a football . 
The camping tent is orange. Mike is throwing the ball. Jenny will catch the ball. 
Mike is wearing a rainbow colored hat Jenny is kicking a football There is a tent and big setting sun behind Mike. 
Jenny is wearing a baseball glove. Jenny is standing in the front of the tent. Mike os kicking the ball. 
Mike and Jenny are playing soccer. Mike and Jenny are camping in the park. An airplane and helicopter are in the sky. 
Jenny kicked the football to Mike. Mike jumped into the air to catch the football. Mike put up his tent near the spring toy. 
Mike is holding a football. A beach ball is on the grass. Jenny wants to catch the football. 
Jenny is kicking the ball to Mike. Mike is waving at Jenny. The helicopter is flying away. 
Mike is near a fire. Mike is very happy Mike is holding foot-ball. 
The dog is in the tree. Jenny has made a hamburger. A hot-air balloon is in the sky. 
The dog is hiding in the tree. Jenny is holding a hamburger. Mike is jumping up and down for joy. 
Jenny is holding a burger. There is a dog in a pine tree. There is a soccer ball near the sandbox. 
The dog is in in the tree. Jenny made a hamburger for Mike. Mike is sad the dog is stuck. 
There is a dog on the tree. Mike is very sad. Jenny is holding a hamburger. 
Jenny has a burger. Mike is not happy. A dog is near Jenny. 
Mike is yelling at the dog. The dog is up in the tree. Jenny is holding out a hamburger. 
Mike is mad at the dog. The dog is in the tree. Jenny has a hamburger. 
Mike is not happy. Jenny is holding a burger. A dog is near a tree. 
Jenny is holding the hamburger. Mike is holding the tennis ball. The dog is in the tree. 
MIke is king for a day Jenny serves him a burger and pizza Jenny is wearing a witch hat 
The sun shines brightly above. Jenny is about to eat some pizza. Mike is waving at Jenny. 
Mike is offering Jenny the pizza. Jenny is angry at Mike. The food is on the picnic table. 
Mike wants to play baseball. Jenny wants to eat lunch  not play. Mike says hello to Jenny. 
Mike tells Jenny that lunch is ready. Jenny has scared the dog away from the table. Mike and Jenny will have pizza and hamburgers. 
Jenny has a lot of food. Mike is waving to Jenny. A hamburger is on the table. 
Mike is angry at Jenny. Jenny is sitting by the hamburger. Mike is wearing a funny hat. 
Jenny does not like pizza. Mike wants a slice of pizza. Mike is by the tree. 
Jenny is wearing Mike's glasses. Mike is holding Jenny's hat. There is a pizza on the table. 
Jenny looks at the table. Mike is wearing a rainbow hat. Someone is flying a kite. 
The dog is standing outside the tent. The picnic table is empty. The weather is bad at the park today. 
Mike is scared by the lightning. Jenny kicked the football to Mike. The dog will hide in the tent. 
Lightning is in the sky. A dog is near a tent. A tree is not too far from the tent. 
Mike and Jenny are staying dry in the tent. Mike's dog is looking for him. It is raining in the park. 
The beach ball is under the picnic table. The soccer ball is next to the dog. The dog is looking into the tent. 
A dog is near a tent. A dog is wearing a blue collar. A tent is near a tree. 
A dog is near a tent. The tent is orange and red. A pie is on the table. 
Mike is scared of thunder. Jenny loves rainstorms. The dog wants to start camping. 
Mike is very sad. Mike is near a tent. There's a base-ball in the grass. 
The dog is wearing purple shades. A tent is near a dog. The tent is orange and red. 
A hot air balloon is in the sky. Mike is jumping off of the picnic table. Jenny is talking to Mike. 
Mike is near jenny. A hot-dog is on the table. soda is on a table. 
Jenny is very happy. Jenny is near a yellow table. Mike is very happy. 
Mike is jumping in the air. Jenny is very sad. Mike is near a yellow table. 
Mike and Jenny run to play. Jenny sees a hot air balloon. The hot air balloon man waves. 
Jenny stands on the picnic table. Mike sees a hot air balloon. Mike and Jenny have a hot dog. 
Jenny is sitting by the picnic table. The sun is in the sky. The picnic table is beside the tree. 
Mike is jumping by the picnic table. There is ketchup and mustard on the table. A hot-air balloon flies in the sky. 
Mike has on a chef hat. Jenny is wearing a gold crown. The owl is eating apples in the tree. 
Mike is jumping in the air. Jenny is watching the hot air balloon. The pizza is near the soda. 
Mike is wearing a funny hat. The mustard and ketchup are on the table. The rain makes Mike sad. 
Mustard and ketchup are on the table. The rain lands on the campfire. Mike is upset about the rain. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Mike is sitting by the fire. The cat is sitting by the fire. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Mike is sitting by the fire. The balloon is flying in the air. 
Mike is mad that it is raining. It is starting to rain on the fire. There are ketchup and mustard on the table. 
Mike is sitting next to the fire. Mike is holding teh hat. Jenny is standing next to Mike. 
Mike is very upset. Mike is near a fire. Mike has a blue hat on. 
Mike is very angry. Mike is sitting by a fire. It is raining on mike.. 
Mike has a star on his hat. Mike is scared of the rain. Jenny is mad at Mike. 
Jenny is sad because it is raining. The cat is sitting by the fire. The ball is sitting on Mike. 
Jenny is crying on the grass. The sun is bright. The swingset is red and blue. 
Mike is wearing shades. Jenny is sitting near a swing-sets. Mike is very shocked. 
Jenny is crying. The hot air balloon is flying above Jenny. Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. 
Jenny is sitting next to the swing set Jenny looks sad Jenny is sitting alone 
Jenny fell off the swing. Jenny is wearing a pirate hat. Jenny is sad because she fell on the ground. 
Jenny sits alone next to a tree An airplane flies over Jenny An owl looks at Jenny 
Jenny is crying by the swing set. There is a football by the playground equipment. There is a hot-air balloon nearby. 
Jenny is wearing a baseball hat. Jenny is sad because she wants the soccer ball. A hot air balloon is in the sky. 
Jenny fell off of the swing. There is a picnic table near the tree. A balloon is in the sky. 
Mike is holding a football. Jenny fell off the swing. The hot-air balloon is floating overhead. 
Mike is carrying ketchup and mustard. A bear is trying to scare Mike. Mike is keeping the ketchup and mustard away from the bear. 
The bear is trying to scare Mike. Mike is holding the ketchup and mustard. Mike is grilling hotdogs for a picnic. 
Mike is not happy. Mike is near a bear. Mike is wearing a hat. 
A bear is trying to scare Mike. Mike is holding a red and a yellow bottle. The bear is wearing a crown. 
Mike is holding the ketchup and mustard. Mike is sitting beside the picnic table. A bear is growling. 
Mike cannot decide between ketchup and mustard. Mike is putting things away after lunch. A bear came out from behind a tree. 
Mike thinks the bear stole his lunch. The bear is trying to scare Mike. Mike's hamburger is missing. 
Mike is holding ketchup and mustard. Mike is sitting by the fire. A bear is standing behind Mike. 
Mike has the mustard and the ketchup. Mike is wearing sunglasses. The bear is behind Mike. 
Mike is very sad. Jenny is near a apple tree. A bear is near mike. 
Jenny and Mike are in the sandbox. The cat is sitting with Mike and Jenny. The dog is outside the sandbox. 
Mike and the cat are in the sandbox. Jenny is holding a toy shovel. A plane is in the sky. 
Mike and Jenny are sad that the cat is in the sandbox. Mike is sitting under an apple tree. Jenny is wants the cat to come to her. 
The cat is in the sandbox. The cat is wearing the hat. Jenny is sitting on the ground. 
Jenny is standing in the sandbox with a shovel. Mike is sad because he fell down. The cat is making Mike and Jenny sad. 
The cat is between Jenny and Mike Jenny is calling the cat Mike stands beside the sandbox 
Jenny calls for the cat Jenny is in front of the apple tree Mike stands beside the sandbox 
Mike sits in the sandbox. Jenny stands in the sandbox. A cat sits in the sandbox. 
Jenny and Mike are trying to get the cat out of the sandbox. The sun is shining brightly in the sky. The hot air ballon is red and yellow. 
The cat is sitting in the sandbox. There is a helicopter in the sky. Mike is sitting sadly on the ground. 
Mike has a hotdog. Jenny is drinking a soda. Mike wants Jenny to share the soda. 
There is a cloud behind the tree. Mike is standing sadly at the picnic table. There is a soda on the picnic table. 
Mike has a hot dog and drink. Mike wears a colorful hat. Mike is sad to be alone. 
Mike is mad at Jenny Jenny is running to the fire. Mike is eating a hot dog. 
Mike is wearing a hat. Mike has a hot dog. Mike looks scared of something. 
Mike is wearing a colorful hat. There is a drink on the picnic table. Jenny is waving her arms at Mike. 
Mike is furious about the lack of ketchup. Jenny is wearing purple sun glasses. Mike is wearing a neat hat. 
Mike kicked the hotdog. Jenny is holding a soda. There is a plane in the sky. 
Jenny loves her new hat. Mike thinks his hot dog tastes bad. A tall tree stands in the grass. 
Mike is holding hot-dog. A cat is near a table. Mike is sittingg in the grass. 
Mike is jumping up and down. Jenny is sad to see lightning and rain. Jenny wants to play with the beachball. 
Jenny is mad that it started raining Jenny is running away from the storm cloud. Jenny is wearing a winter hat. 
It is raining on the picnic table. Jenny is holding a pink bucket. The tree is behind Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing a crown. Jenny is mad it is getting stormy. Jenny brought her ball and sand pail to the park. 
Jenny is under the picnic table. The cat is beside Jenny. It is raining on the picnic table. 
There is a cloud in the sky. Jenny is mad because it is raining. Jenny is standing beside a table. 
Jenny is mad because it is raining. Jenny wanted to play in the sandbox. Jenny has to go home now. 
Jenny is scared of the storm. Jenny is standing by the tree. Jenny is waving her arms. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The bear is wearing a viking hat. A cloud is raining on the bear. 
Jenny is angry that the day at the park is ruined. It is raining and lightning. The picnic table is going to get wet! 
Jenny is mad because the owl is on the swingset. Mike is running to see Jenny. Mike is happy today. 
An owl is on the swing set. Jenny is angry at the owl. Jenny is standing next to a bucket. 
The owl is perched on the swingset. Mike is jumping for joy. Jenny is mad at the owl. 
The owl is on top of the swing set. Jenny is wearing glasses. Mike is wearing a crown. 
An owl is sitting on the swing. Mike is kicking the football at Jenny. Jenny is upset with Mike. 
Mike is in the sandbox. The owl is on the swing set. There is a shovel in the sandbox. 
The owl is sitting on the swing. Jenny is mad at the owl. Jenny is wearing a winter cap. 
Mike is going to get the baseball and bat. The owl is on top of the swing set. Mike is happy to play ball. 
Jenny tries to scare the owl away. Mike is excited to play frisbee. A owl sits on top of the swings. 
Mike wears a pirate's hat. Jenny wears sunglasses. An owl sits on the swing set. 
Mike is holding the bat. Jenny is holding the ball. The bear is scaring Jenny and Mike. 
jenny is very scared. Mike is very upset. Mike is wearing a blue hat. 
The big bear is scaring Mike and Jenny. Mike and Jenny are wearing hats. The camp fire is protecting Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny is aggravated with the Bear. Mike is very worried. There is a huge bear nearby. 
Mike and Jenny are running from the bear. The bear is scary. Mike lost his hat. 
Mike and Jenny are in the playground. They saw the bear at the playground. Mike and Jenny ran away from the bear. 
A bear is chasing Mike and Jenny. Mike is wearing a blue hat. Jenny is wearing purple glasses. 
Mike and Jenny are running away from the bear. The bear has scared Mike and Jenny. It is raining on the barbecue. 
Mike and Jenny run away from the bear. The bear scared Mike and Jenny away. The bear wants to eat Mike and Jenny's hotdogs. 
Jenny and Mike run away from a bear. Mike is not happy. The soccer ball is next to the tree. Mike and Jenny are running from the bear. The soccer ball is in front of the apple tree. There are two trees in the park. 
Jenny has a chef hat on. There is a pizza on the table. It is a cloudy day today. 
Jenny is running toward the picnic table. There is a pepperoni pizza on the table. A gray clouds hangs overhead. 
Jenny has on a chef's hat. There is a pizza on the picnic table. There is a hot dog on the picnic table. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The pizza is near the hot dog on the table. The helicopter is flying over Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing a chef's hat. The pizza is on the picnic table. The campfire is beside the picnic table. 
The hotdog is on the table. Jenny sees the pizza on the table. A bucket of sand is under the tree. 
The food is on the table. Jenny is wearing a yellow hat. Jenny is running to the table. 
Jenny is holding a hot dog. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The pizza is on the grass. 
Jenny is waving. The pizza and the hot dog are on the table. No one is playing in the sandbox today. 
Mike and Jenny are having lunch. There is a pink bucket under the picnic table. A jet plane flies overhead. 
Jenny is wearing a funny hat. Mike is running fast near Jenny. It is raining above Jenny. 
The duck is at the park today. Jenny and Mike are mad because it is raining. There is a hot dog on the table. 
Jenny and Mike are mad because it is raining. The cat is standing at Mike's feet. It is raining over the swing set. 
It is raining on the hotdog and drink. Jenny and Mike don't like the rain. Jenny is yelling at the raincloud. 
Rain is falling from the cloud. The fire is between Mike and Jenny. The swings are behind Jenny. 
Jenny is standing by the swing. Mike is wearing the hat. It is raining at the park. 
A hamburger and hotdog are on the table. It is raining on the picnic table. Mike is holding the balloons. 
Mike is very upset. Jenny is near  rain. jenny is very upset. 
Jenny is near a soccer-ball. Mike is holding a tennis rack Jenny is wearing pink. 
Mike and Jenny are upset that it is raining. The racket is between Mike and Jenny. Mike and Jenny are arguing with each other. 
The dog is beside Mike. Jenny is happy Mike is running to her. There are three burgers on the grill. 
Mike is happy to see Jenny. Jenny is excited to be camping. The hot dogs are cooking on the grill. 
The dog is next to Mike. Jenny is pointing at the grill. Mike is walking toward Jenny. 
Jenny made hotdogs for lunch. Jenny made hotdogs for Mike. Mike and his dog came to the park for a picnic. 
Mike is excited about the barbecue Mike's dog is trying to get at the dog food Jenny just realized that she is grilling dog food 
There is a single cloud in the sky. Jenny has a hamburger on the grill. Mike is running to meet Jenny. 
Jenny and Mike are playing with the dog at the park. The dog has a tennis ball in his mouth. There are three hot dogs on the grill. 
Mike is behind a dog Jenny is beside a grill Jenny is wearing a chef hat 
Jenny is happy to see Mike and his dog. Mike and his dog came to play with Jenny. Mike and Jenny will have hotdogs for lunch. 
Jenny is giving Mike a hamburger. Mike is happy to see Jenny. The dog is walking with Mike. 
Jenny is wearing a hat. A bear is behind Jenny. Mike is scared of the bear. 
Jenny is on the slide. Mike sees the bear. The bear  sees Jenny. 
The bear is trying to scare Mike and Jenny. Mike's dog is standing close to Mike. The bear is wearing a viking hat. 
The snuck up on Mike. Jenny is holding four balloons Jenny is sitting on the ground. 
Jenny is holding four balloons. The bear is beside the tree. An airplane is flying in the sky. 
Jenny has a baseball bat in her hand. Mike is afraid of the bear. The bear had sharp claws. 
The bear is standing by the slide. Jenny is wearing a colorful hat. Mike is wearing a winter cap. 
Jenny is holding a cup. A helicopter is flying in the sky. Jenny is mad  and Mike is sad. 
Jenny is wearing a silly hat. Mike is mad because Jenny has the hot dog. The bear is hiding behind the tree. 
Jenny is flying the kite. Mike does not want to watch Jenny fly the kite. The bear is trying to scare Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing a crown. The bear is standing under the tree. Jenny is happy  but Mike is sad. 
The dog is wearing a pirate hat. Jenny and Mike are playing tag. A helicopter is flying over the park. 
Jenny is wearing a witch's cap. Jenny is standing next to the picnic table. The cat is standing by Jenny. 
Jenny is waving to Mike. Mike is sad because he doesn't have a ball to play with. The duck is hiding behind the trees. 
The bear is behind a tree. Jenny is going to play tennis. Mike wants to play with Jenny. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is happy to see Mike. Mike sees a hole in the tree. 
The bear is hiding behind the tree. Mike is waving behind Jenny. Jenny is scared of the snake. 
A snake is by the slide. Jenny is very happy. A cloud is in the sky. 
Jenny is running away from Mike. Mike is worried Jenny is running away. The cat is hiding from Mike and Jenny. 
There is an owl watching Jenny and Mike. Mike is jumping in the air with Jenny. Jenny is happy that she is with Mike. 
Mike and Jenny are happy Mike is sitting next to the tree Jenny is sitting next to Mike 
Mike is wearing a blue cap. Jenny is happy to see Mike. The hot air balloon is red and yellow. 
Mike sat on the swing set. Jenny brought Mike a soda. The hot air balloon flew over the tent. 
Jenny is sitting in the grass. Mike has a colorful hat on. Jenny is next to a soccer-ball. 
Mike and Jenny are holding hands. The hot air balloon flies over Mike. Jenny is happy to be outside. 
Jenny is excited to see Mike. Mike is wearing a blue hat. Jenny is jumping. 
Mike and Jenny are camping in the park. Jenny shows Mike she put the tent up. Mike runs over to see the tent. 
Jenny waves at the snake Mike is sitting in the grass Mike and Jenny are camping 
Mike and Jenny are sitting cross legged on the ground. There is a dog next to Mike. A snake is next to the tree which is next to the tent. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. There is an owl in the tree. Jenny is going camping. 
Jenny is scared of the snake. Mike tries to scare the snake away. The dog sees the snake. 
Jenny is sitting in the grass. There is a snake beside Mike. Mike is wearing a winter hat. 
Jenny cries in fear of the large snake. The sun partially hides behind the small tree. The large dog smiles at the green snake. 
Jenny runs from a green snake. Mike wears purple sunglasses. Mike's dog smiles at a green snake. 
Mike is near a dog. Jenny is very sad. Jenny is sitting near a tree. 
Jenny is angry that she didn't kick the soccer ball far. Mike is shocked to see a snake. The dog is happy at the park. 
Jenny is holding a pizza. A snake is in front of Mike. Lightning is coming from a cloud. 
Mike is jumping in the air. Jenny is sitting in the grass. The dog is standing next to Mike. 
A hot air balloon is in the sky. Jenny is sitting in the grass. Mike is following the dog. 
Mike is very sad. jenny is very sad. A snake is near mike. 
Mike is holding the glove. Jenny dropped her hot dog. Mike is standing by the fire. 
Jenny is crying. Mike looks mad. Jenny and Mike are by a fire. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Jenny is sitting next to the fire. Mike is standing next to the tent. 
Jenny is sitting next to the tent. Mike is holding the glove. Jenny is sitting next to the fire. 
Mike and Jenny have a tent set up. Jenny is sitting by the fire. The owl is sitting on the tent. 
Jenny burned her hand on the campfire. Mike wants to play catch. Mike and Jenny are camping. 
A tearful Jenny fell down by the campfire. A worried Mike holds the baseball glove. The campfire is burning between Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny is crying because she has fallen to the ground. Mike is trying to warm his baseball glove over the fire. The owl is sitting on the swingset watching Mike and Jenny. 
Mike is not happy with his glove. Jenny is not happy beside the campfire. The tent is ready for the night. 
The rocket is flying in the sky. Mike is holding a soda. Jenny is crying next to the fire. 
Jenny is sad that there is no pizza. Mike is happy to be holding the balloons. Mike is sitting in the grass. 
Mike had four balloons. Jenny wanted to eat the pie first. Jenny wore her helmet with horns on it. 
Mike is bringing Jenny balloons. Jenny wonders what Mike has. Mike and Jenny will have a picnic today. 
Jenny is wearing a red and gray hat. Mike is holding balloons. Jenny is sitting next to the pie. 
Jenny is wearing a crown. Jenny is sitting under the tree. The mustard is beside the pie. 
Mike is holding balloons. Jenny is waving to Mike. There is a pie and some ketchup on the table. 
Jenny is mad Mike isn't listening to her. Mike is excited about the balloons. Jenny has pizza and pie. 
Mike holds the baloons Jenny is in front of the tree Jenny is behind the table 
Jenny has a hot dog. Mike is not happy. Nobody is on the swings. 
Mike has a bunch of balloons. Jenny has a pie to eat. Jenny is waving hello to Mike. 
The bear has a hamburger and drink. Jenny and Mike are kicking the bear. It is a cloudy day. 
Jenny and Mike are kicking a bear. A beach ball is on the ground. A cloud is in the sky. 
There is an apple tree behind Mike. Jenny is kicking the bear. Mike is kicking the bear like Jenny is. 
Jenny kicks the bear. Mike kicks the bear. The bear is mad at Jenny and Mike. 
Mike and Jenny went to the park. At the park  Mike and Jenny ran into a bear. The bear is holding a hamburger and soda. 
Mike and Jenny are kicking the bear. The bear took the soda and hamburger. Mike is closest to the tree. 
Mike is wearing the hat. The bear is holding the burger. Jenny is wearing the hat. 
The bear is holding a hamburger and soda. Mike and Jenny are kicking the bear. Mike is wearing glasses. 
Mike and Jenny are mad at the bear. The bear takes Mike and Jenny's food because he is hungry. Mike and Jenny want their food and drink back. 
Mike is kicking the bear. Jenny is kicking the bear. Jenny has purple glasses. 
Mike kicked the ball high. Mike is wearing a star ball cap. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike is kicking his leg. A dog is watching Mike. A ball and plane are in the sky. 
Mike just kicked the ball. Mike has a red bucket. The tree has red apples. 
Mike hits the soccer ball. A helicopter is near the park. A hot-air balloon is flying close to the park. 
Mike is kicking the soccer ball. A dog is watching Mike play. There is a big sun in the sky. 
jenny is sitting in the grass. Mike is wearing a hat Mike is very happy. 
Jenny is flying a kite. There is a soccer ball in the sky. Mike is kicking his leg. 
Mike is wearing a baseball hat. Mike kicks the ball into the air. A balloon is in he sky. 
Mike kicked his soccer ball into the air. Mike is playing soccer in the park. An airplane is flying over the park. 
Mike is wearing glasses Mike is wearing a blue cap The airplane is flying towards the rocket 
Mike wears a king's crown. Jenny is sad. The snake likes the warm sun. 
Jenny is wearing a hat. Jenny is standing beside the swing set. Jenny is surprised by the snake. 
Jenny is scared of the snake. Jenny is standing next to the sliding board. Mike is trying to kick the snake. 
Mike is happy to see Jenny on the swings. Jenny is scared because a snake is at her playground. A plane is flying over Jenny's head. 
Jenny was worried it would get cool when the clouds came in. Jenny was scared when she saw a snake heading for Mike. Mike was excited to see a real live snake. 
Mike is looking at the swings. The sun is shining. There is a snake above the swing. 
Jenny is standing near the swings. Mike is running through the park to play with Jenny. There is a snake near the swingset. Watch out Mike and Jenny! 
A snake is near the swings. The sun is behind the tree. Mike seems quite happy. 
Jenny is waving Mike over. Jenny is by the swings. There is a snake by Jenny. 
The snake is beside the swing set. Mike is happy  but Jenny is crying. The cat is watching the snake. 
The cat is stuck on the slide Jenny is calling for help Bee buzzy thinks the cat is a big baby 
The owl is on Jenny's arm. Jenny is holding a soda. The cat is next to Jenny. 
An owl is sitting in the tree. Jenny is looking for Mike. The cat wants to climb the tree. 
Jenny is sad. Mike has flown away in a hot air balloon. Jenny doesn't want the owl to attack her cat. 
Jenny is holding a bucket. The cat is sitting beside Jenny. The owl is sitting beside Jenny. 
Mike is very angry. A cat is near jenny. It is raining near jenny. 
The owl is sitting by the cat. The riding toy is beside the tree. The basketball is resting in the grass. 
Jenny is waving to the hot air ballon. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The orange cat is sitting beside Jenny. 
Jenny is upset with the cat. The owl likes to hang out with Jenny. Jenny is wearing a whirlygig cap. 
The cat is on the table. The owl is next to the cat. Jenny does not like animals on the table. 
The dog and cat see each other. It is lightning in the park. There is an airplane flying in the sky. 
The dog is wearing sunglasses. The sandbox is empty. The cat is under the apple tree. 
The cat is under the apple tree. The jet flies through a storm. The dog is looking at the tree. 
The dog stands next to a tree. The airplane is in the air. There is a picnic table close to the tree. 
The cat and dog are under the tree. The soccer ball is behind the apple tree. The airplane is flying in the sky. 
The dog is sitting under the tree. Lightning is coming from the cloud. The tree is full of apples. 
The cat is sitting under the tree. The plane is flying in the sky. The dog is standing under the tree. 
An airplane is flying in the sky. A cat is sitting under the apple tree. A ball is sitting in the grass. 
Lightning comes from the cloud A plane passes by The dog is behind the cat 
A dog is near a tree. A cat is near a dog. A cat is wearing a blue collar. 
Jenny is sitting under the apple tree. The dog took Jenny's hamburger. Mike is waving at Jenny. 
Mike feeds his hamburger to Sammy. "Jenny yells ""stop feeding the dog your hamburger!""." Mike thinks this is really funny. 
Mike is offering food to Jenny Jenny is standing next to the appletree Mike is standing under the hot air balloon 
A plane flies overhead. Jenny is sitting under the apple tree. Mike is holding the hamburger out. 
Mike is mad at the dog. Mike and Jenny are having a picnic. It is going to rain in the park. 
The dog stole the hamburger. Jenny fell on the ground. Mike sees red apples on the tree. 
Lunch is cooking on the grill. Mike is giving Jenny a hamburger. Jenny is telling Mike about the rain. 
The dog is coming toward Jenny. Jenny is afraid of the dog. Mike dropped is hamburger. 
Mike fed a hamburger to his dog. The dog loves hamburgers. Jenny wished she had a hamburger. 
Mike is trying to share his hamburger with Jenny. The dog has jumped in Jenny's lap. The hot air ballon is flying high. 
Mike is very happy. Mike is playing with a soccer-ball. Mike is near a apple tree. 
Mike is kicking a soccer ball. There is a pie on top of the table. The sun is shining very bright behind Mike. 
Mike is kicking the ball to the duck. Mike is wearing his hat sideways. Mike is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike is holding a football. A tree has apples on it. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. 
Mike kicks a soccer ball. Apples are growing on the tree. There is a toy bumblebee. 
Mike has his hat on sideways. Mike is kicking a soccer ball. The sun is setting  it is almost time to go home. 
Mike kicks the soccer ball. Mike is playing soccer on a sunny day. A helicopter is flying over the park. 
Mike is playing soccer The sun is out There is a table under the apple tree 
Mike is playing soccer. Mike brought his cat with. Mike's cat chases the ball. 
Mike and Jenny's pie and drink sit on the picnic table. Mike kicks a soccer ball. Mike smiles when the ball lands near an apple tree. 
Mike is throwing the ball to Jenny. Jenny is wearing a hat. It is raining on Mike and Jenny. 
Mike threw the Frisbee to Jenny. It is stormy and rainy at the park. Jenny has a baseball mitt on. 
Jenny says they should go in because of the storm Mike says keep playing The rain gets closer 
Jenny is standing by the tree. Mike threw the ball to Jenny. Jenny is going to catch the ball. 
Mike sees the rain and lightening. Jenny throws the baseball to Mike. Mike is scared of the storm. 
The sky has rain and lightening. Jenny and Mike are playing ball. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
Mike is angry because it is raining. Jenny is scared of the thunderstorm. The beach ball is behind Mike and Jenny. 
Mike is sad because he wants the glove. Jenny is wearing the glove. It is raining in the park. 
It is raining on Jenny and Mike. Jenny and Mike are mad. Jenny is holding a baseball mitt. 
Clouds are in the sky above Jenny and Mike. Mike has a football. Jenny is holding out her arms  ready to catch the football. 
Mike is sitting by the fire. Jenny is sitting by the fire. A snake is scaring Jenny. 
Mike is sitting by the fire. Jenny is sad because she sees a snake. Mike is afraid because he sees a snake. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses Jenny is sitting next to the snake Mike and Jenny sit next to the fire 
Mike and Jenny are sitting next a fire Mike and Jenny are waving to the snake Jenny is wearing a baseball cap 
Jenny is surprised at the orange tent. A green snake slithers towards the campfire. Mike and Jenny sit next to the tree. 
There is a helicopter flying. Mike and Jenny look angry. There is a green snake. 
Jenny looks startled by the snake. The snake is behind Mike. Mike and Jenny are sitting at a campsite. 
Mike is very surprised. Jenny is very shocked. There is a green snake near Jenny. 
Jenny has purple glasses. Mike is afraid of the snake. Jenny does not see the snake. 
An airplane flies over Jenny's head. Jenny and Mike are sitting around a fire. There is a snake in the grass near Mike. 
Jenny has a bunch of balloons. Mike is worried about his hotdogs. Mike and Jenny will have hotdogs for lunch. 
Mike is playing in the sand box. Jenny is trying to share her balloons with Mike. Mike and Jenny are happy to be friends. 
Jenny showed Mike where the hotdog was. Mike wanted to put ketchup on his hotdog. Jenny had four balloons in her hand. 
Jenny is holding three balloons. A bottle of ketchup is on the table. There is a hot dog on the table. 
Mike is near a table. Jenny is reaching for a hot-dog. A dog is near mike. 
Mike and Jenny are happy. The hotdog is on the table. The airplane is flying in the sky. 
Mike has a bottle of ketchup. Jenny has a cat. Mike is wearing goggles. 
Jenny is giving Mike balloons and a hot dog. Jenny is standing by the dog. Mike is excited to get a balloon. 
Jenny has four balloons. Mike is looking at Jenny. Jenny is smiling at Mike. 
Jenny is holding a football and some balloons. Mike is wearing a big grey hat. Mike is scared. 
Mike is flying a kite. The dog and the snake are looking at each other. Jenny and Mike are standing by the slide. 
Jenny wants the snake to go away. Mike is flying a kite. The snake is headed toward the apple tree. 
The green snake is next to the tree. Jenny is flying a kite. Mike and Jenny are scared. 
Mike is flying the kite. The dog is standing next to Jenny. The air plane is flying in the sky. 
Mike is flying a kite. Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is sitting under the tree. 
Mike is very shock. Jenny is very shock. Mike is holding a kite.. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is really excited Mike is near a snake. 
Mike wants to play with the snake. The bucket is next to Jenny. The snake is green. 
Jenny is flying a kite. Mike sees a snake. Jenny dropped her frisbee. 
The dog and the snake are going to play. Jenny is afraid that the dog and snake are not friends. No one is playing in the sandbox. 
Mike is having a cookout. The dog wants to eat Mike's hot dog. Mike is sitting under the apple tree. 
jenny is very surprised. Mike is holding a hot-dog. Jenny is very happy. 
Mike is near a dog. A fire is near mike. Mike is wearing blue. 
The picnic table is under the apple tree. Mike has made a hot dog. The dog is sniffing at the hot dog. 
Mike is upset the dog is on the picnic table. The dog will eat the hotdog. The picnic table is yellow. 
Mike is not happy. Mike is near a dog. Mike is near a yellow table. 
Mike tries to shoo the dog off the table. The dog jumped onto the picnic table. The dog might eat Mike's hotdog. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Mike is holding a hot dog. A dog is standing beside Mike. 
Mike is wearing a pirate hat There is a plane flying through the sky The dog is about to eat a hotdog 
Mike is holding a hotdog. The dog is looking at the hotdog. Mike is in front of the picnic table. 
Mike is wearing a chefs hat. The snake is enjoying the fire. Jenny is wearing a baseball mitt. 
Mike is holding a soda. Jenny is warming up near the fire. The green snake is in the grass. 
Mike and Jenny are by the fire. Mike and Jenny are happy to see the snake leave. The snake is by the apple tree. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny Is very happy. Mike is near a snake. 
The hot air balloon is on the ground. Jenny is enjoying the camp fire. Jenny is enjoying a soda. 
Jenny and Mike are happy. Mike is beside the tree. The campfire is between Mike and Jenny. 
Mike and Jenny are sitting by the camp fire. Mike and Jenny are happy together. The snake is sneaking up behind Mike. 
Jenny and Mike are sitting by the fire. The snake is in the grass. Mike is in front of the apple tree. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very happy. Mike is near a snake. 
Mike is holding a frisbee in his hands. Jenny is warming up by the fire. The snake moves away from the fire. 
Mike is standi by Jenny. The pit is by the table. The helicopter is flying in the sky. 
Jenny is wearing a baseball cap. A helicopter is in the sky. Jenny is standing in front of a tent. 
Jenny is very surprised. Mike is very happy. Jenny is near a tree. 
Lightning begins to strike outside. Mike is sad about the storm. The helicopter is flying close to the lightning. 
Mike is standing by the swing. Jenny is standing by Mike. The cat is sitting by the swing. 
Jenny is wearing a winter cap. Jenny and Mike are by the tent. A helicopter flies nearby. 
A helicopter is in the sky. Mike is wearing purple glasses. Mike and Jenny are waving. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is wearing the hat. The helicopter is flying in the sky. 
Mike is jumping in the air. The pizza in on the grass. Jenny is sitting on the grass. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is wearing sun glasses. The helicopter is flying in the sky. 
Jenny wants the hamburger. Mike has a cold drink. A snake follows Jenny. 
Mike is sitting by the slide. Jenny is wearing a baseball cap. Mike has a hamburger. 
Jenny is holding a kite. Mike is holding a hamburger. Red apples are in the tree. 
Mike is sitting on the ground. Mike is holding a hamburger. A hot air balloon is in the sky. 
Jenny is running to Mike. Mike has a hamburger and hotdog. The apple tree has four apples. 
A hamburger is on the table. Mike is wearing a hat. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
Mike tells Jenny lunch is ready. Jenny sees lunch on a picnic table. Jenny is running to the picnic table. 
Mike is wearing the hat. Mike is holding the burger. Jenny is standing by the ball. 
Jenny is running to see Mike. Mike is standing by the picnic table. There are three hot dogs cooking on the grill. 
Mike is eating and drinking. Mike wants to share a drink with Jenny. Jenny is wearing a blue hat. 
There is one cloud in the sky. Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is holding a tennis racket. 
Jenny has a tennis racket. Mike has a tennis ball. The cat is beside Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses and wants to play tennis. Mike is sad because he does not have sunglasses. There is a hot air balloon flying in the sky. 
Jenny is holding a tennis racket. Mike is in front of the sand box. It is starting to rain on Mike. 
Jenny is holding a tennis ball. Mike is holding a soccer ball. It is a cloudy day. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is holding a tennis racket. The sun is covered by clouds. 
A helicopter is flying in the sky. Jenny is wearing a crown. Mike is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike is wearing sunglasses. Jenny wants to play tennis. Jenny is smiling at Mike. 
Jenny is holding a tennis racket. Jenny and Mike each stand by a tree. Mike is looking angrily at Jenny. 
Mike is sad he hurt his foot. Jenny is holding up a tennis racquet. The dog is watching Mike. 
Mike is sitting by the campfire. The cat is wearing a hat. The tree has red apples. 
Mike is sitting by the fire. The cat is wearing a witch hat! Mike is wearing a colorful silly hat. 
The campfire is burning red and orange. the girl is sitting by the fire. The cat is wearing a witch hat. 
The cat is wearing a hat. Mike is next to the campfire. The cat is looking at Mike. 
Mike is very excited. Mike is near a cat. A cat has a blue collar. 
Mike is eating a hot dog. The cat is wearing a wizard hat. Mike and the cat are sitting by the fire. 
Mike is telling a story. The cat is wearing a pointy hat. The baseball is next to the hamburger. 
The cat is secretly a wizard. Mike is curious about the cat. Mike sits near the fire. 
Mike is sitting next to the fire Mike is sitting next to the cat Mike is happy to see the wizard cat 
Mike is enjoying his campfire. Mike wore a pirate hat to the park today. The cat is wearing a witch hat. 
The duck has a viking hat. There is a plane in the sky. There is a soda on the table. 
The sun is above Mike and Jenny. Mike and Jenny see the duck with a hat. Jenny thinks the duck looks funny. 
A duck is next to Mike. Jenny sees the duck. Jenny is smiling at Mike. 
Jenny is very happy. Mike is excited. A duck is wearing a vikings hat. 
The duck is wearing a hat with horns. Jenny and Mike are next to the tree. A red and yellow balloon is in the sky. 
A bird is on the picnic table. A hat with horns is on the bird. Mike and Jenny are laughing at the bird. 
Mike is laughing at the duck. Jenny is sitting on the ground. Mike is wearing a blue shirt. 
There are four balloons in the sky. The duck is wearing a hat. There are two balls in the grass. 
A hot air balloon is flying in the sky. A duck is wearing a hat. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
Mike is laughing at the duck. The duck is wearing at hat. Jenny is standing under the tree. 
Mike and Jenny are sitting under an apple tree. Jenny hears an airplane. The car is sitting next to Jenny. 
Mike is holding a burger. Jenny is holding a soccer ball. Jenny wants a burger. 
Mike is eating a hot dog. Jenny is eating a hamburger. Mike and Jenny are sitting by a tree. 
Jenny and Mike sit on the ground A glove is behind Jenny There's a football between Jenny and Mike 
Jenny holds a hot dog Mike holds a hamburger There's a basketball between Mike and Jenny 
Mike has a hamburger. Jenny has a hot dog. Mike and Jenny sit under an apple tree. 
There are three hot dogs on the grill. Mike has a hamburger. Jenny is sad because she has a hot dog and wants the hamburger. 
Mike is sitting with a hot dog. Jenny is sitting with a hamburger. Jenny is sitting by the apple tree. 
Mike and Jenny are sitting under an apple tree. Jenny has a hot dog. Mike has a hamburger. 
Mike is very happy. Jenny is very sad. Jenny is holding her hot-dog. 
The sun is in they sky. A ball is on the table. Mike has sunglasses on. 
Jenny thinks it's funny an owl is on the picnic table. Mike and Jenny see an owl on the table. Mike shows Jenny the owl on the table. 
Jenny is standing next to an Apple tree. Mike is happy to see Jenny. Mike and Jenny are ready to eat pie. 
Mike is near a pie. jenny is near a table. There's a ketchup bottle on a table. 
Mike is near a table. jenny is near a dog. There's a pie on the table. 
Jenny baked a pie for Mike. Mike forgot to bring drinks. The dog wants to play catch. 
Jenny is holding balloons. Mike is holding a pie. Mike is very surprised. 
Mike is near a slide. jenny is near mike. There's a soccer-ball on the table. 
Mike is looking at the pie. Jenny is waving at the helicopter. Jenny is standing by the table. 
A pie is on the table. A dog is near Mike A balloon is in the sky. 
Mike is wearing a purple witch hat. Jenny is wearing a blue hat with a star. There are five apples on the tree. 
At sunset Mike appears to yell at Jenny as she sat on the grass Jenny appears to be gazing at an owl An owl stand in the park beside the tree. 
Jenny and Mike want to play with the owl. Mike is sitting in the grass. There is a ball in e grass. 
Jenny found her witch hat. Mike sees a goose. A goose is walking up to Mike and Jenny. 
Jenny fell on Mike. The owl was sitting on the glasses. The duck wore a blue wizard's hat. 
A duck is wearing a wizard's hat. Some sunglasses are on the grass beneath the tree. Jenny and Mike are happy. 
The dog is wearing a wizard hat. The kite is stuck in the tree. Jenny is calling the dog to her. 
Jenny is near a duck. A owl is wearing purple shades. Mike is near jenny. 
Jenny found her hat in the tree. Mike is going to pull Jenny's pigtail. The owl took the hat and the sunglasses. 
Jenny is very happy. Jenny is near a apple tree. Jenny is wearing the color pink. 
There is an owl in the tree. Jenny is holding a baseball bat. There is a pie infront of Jenny. 
Jenny is holding a baseball bat. An owl is sitting in the tree. A pie is sitting in the grass. 
The owl is in the tree. The tree is small and green. Jenny can not get the owl down from the tree. 
Jenny is holding a bat Mike is in front of the apple tree There's an owl behind Mike 
Jenny is holding a bat. Mike is near a tree. Mike is near a pie. 
Mike wants to trade with Jenny. Mike made a pie. Jenny has a baseball bat. 
Jenny is holding a baseball bat. There is a pie near Jenny. An owl is sitting on a tree. 
Mike is standing near jenny. Jenny is not happy. Jenny is near a pie. 
Jenny wants the pie. Mike is surprised that jenny has a bat. An owl is sitting in the tree. 
There is an owl sitting in the tree. There is a pie on the ground. Jenny is holding a baseball bat. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is standing by Jenny. The bat is next to the ball. 
Mike is near the soccer ball. Jenny is near the basketball. Mike and Jenny are happy. 
Mike is very happy with jenny. Jenny is near a basketball. Mike is wearing blue. 
Mike and Jenny are excited about the toys. Mike is holding a baseball bat. The sun is behind a cloud. 
Jenny and Mike have two balls. Jenny and Mike are happy. The baseball bat is under the tree. 
Mike and Jenny are going to play sports. Jenny is going to get the bat. Mike is excited to play with Jenny. 
Jenny is excited that she is going to play with Mike today. Mike is surprised that it is such a cloudy day. Mike and Jenny have found a pile of sports equipment to play with. 
Mike is wearing a hat. Mike is near the basketball. Jenny is near the soccer ball. 
An airplane is flying over the park. Jenny and Mike have a lot of toys to choose from. Jenny is excited to see Mike in the park. 
Mike and Jenny want to play ball. The hat is next to the ball. Mike is behind Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing a Viking hat. Jenny is angry at the owl. The rocket is flying over Jenny. 
The hamburger is under the tree. The cat is in front of Jenny. Jenny is sad that she can not find Mike. 
Mike dropped his hot dog. Jenny is jumping toward the rocket. Mike is running near the tree. 
There is a campfire in the park. Mike is nowhere to be found. The rocket is flying through the sky. 
Jenny is scared of the rocketship. The cat is watching Jenny. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. 
There is a shovel in the sandbox. There is a rocket in the sky. The cat is sitting beside Jenny. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The dog is standing near the picnic table. The rocket is flying in the sky. 
Mike is holding the ball. The rocket is flying in the sky. The dog is standng next to Mike. 
Jenny is wearing sunglasses. Jenny is angry because the rocket is leaving. The owl is in the tree. 
Jenny has a bottle of ketchup. Jenny is making hot dogs. Jenny has on a chef hat. 
It is raining on the campfire. Jenny is sitting by the campfire. Mike is angry  and Jenny is surprised. 
Mike is mad at Jenny. The rain is about to put out the campfire. A bat and baseball are lying in the grass. 
Mike is angry that it is raining on the fire. Jenny is wearing sunglasses. The pie and mitt are on the ground near Jenny. 
There is a rain cloud in the sky. Mike is wearing a Viking hat. Jenny is wearing a winter cap. 
Jenny points at the rain. The rain falls on the tent. Mike and Jenny made a campfire. 
It is raining out. Jenny has a hat on. Mike seems quite sad. 
Jenny is near the fire. Mike wants Jenny to play with him. Mike is angry that it is starting to rain. 
It is starting to rain. Jenny is jumping in the air. Mike is waving his arms. 
It started to rain in the park. The rain might put out the fire. Mike is mad it is raining on his fire. 
Mike and Jenny are doing a rain dance The dance worked The owl wants to go in the tent 
Mike and Jenny enjoy a pizza for lunch. Mike is holding four balloons. Jenny is sitting on the ground. 
The sun is in the sky. Mike is bringing Jenny pizza. Jenny is wearing a witch's cap. 
Mike is holding his arms up. Jenny is sitting at the picnic table. Mike and Jenny like pepperoni pizza. 
Jenny brought pizza for lunch. Mike loves to eat pizza. The pizza has pepperoni on it. 
Jenny is bringing a pizza for Mike. Mike is wearing a baseball cap. Mike is standing in front of the sandbox. 
Mike has a pizza to share. The dog wants Mike's cold drink. Mike is happy to see Jenny. 
Jenny has a soda. Mike is near a tree. A cloud is in the sky. 
Jenny is holding a pizza. Mike is jumping in the air. The soda is on the grass. 
The pizza is in the grass. Jenny is sitting next to the beach ball. Mike has his arms in the arm. 
Mike threw the pizza in the air. Jenny is jumping up and down. The sun is high in the sky. 
Jenny kicked the ball. Mike is wearing a hat. The ball landed on the pizza. 
Jenny kicked the football. The football landed in the pizza. Mike is sad the pizza got ruined. 
Jenny kicked the football onto the pizza. Mike is sad about the pizza. Jenny is standing under the tree. 
Jenny kicked the ball to Mike. The football landed on the pizza when Jenny kicked it. Mike is sad that the pizza is ruined. 
Jenny kicked the ball onto Mike's pizza. Mike is holding the pizza. Mike is upset at Jenny. 
The football landed on the pizza. Mike is upset the football landed on his pizza. Jenny sees that her football landed on Mike's pizza. 
The football landed on the pizza. Jenny kicked the football. The pizza is on the grass. 
Mike is wearing a baseball hat Mike is sad about the pizza being ruined Jenny kicked the football 
Jenny has on a blue hat. Jenny kicked the football. It landed on Mike's pizza. 
Mike is very surprised. Jenny is near mike. Mike is near a pizza. 
Jenny offers her crown to the owl Jenny is standing next to a tree Jenny is looking for Mike 
An owl is sitting in a tree. Jenny is wearing a princess hat. There is a cloud in the sky. 
Jenny is waving her crown at the owl Jenny is wearing sunglasses Jenny is sitting next to the tent 
Jenny is holding the crown. The owl sits in the tree. An airplane flies over the park. 
Jenny is wearing a crown. Jenny is smiling at the owl. Jenny is standing near the tent. 
Jenny is waving to someone. The owl is standing on Jenny's hand. The pie is in front of Jenny. 
Jenny has a crown with gems. Jenny is happy to see a snake. The owl is sitting in the tree. 
Jenny has a pretty crown. The sun is shining brightly over the tent. The owl is sitting in the tree. 
An owl is sitting on the barbecue. Jenny is holding a crown. The kite's tail is red. 
The rocket shoots across the sky. The owl sits on the tent. Jenny has a crown with red and blue gems. 
Mike is holding a soda. Jenny is running to Mike. Mike is wearing a viking hat. 
Mike is wearing a viking hat. The bear is scaring Mike. There is a balloon in the sky. 
The bear is roaring at Mike. Mike is sitting in front of the tree. There are three hamburgers on the grill. 
Mike is very upset. Mike is sitting in the grass. Mike is wearing black shades. 
Mike fell down. Jenny is copying the bear. Mike hurt his leg. 
Mike is worried his fire is about to go out. The bear does not like fire in his woods. The bear is about to put out Mike's fire. 
Mike is sitting on the ground. Mike is scared of a bear. Mike is in front of a tree. 
The Bear scares Jenny away. Mike falls down afraid of the bear. Bears are not allowed in the park. 
Mike is trying to face his fear of bears. The bear is trying to scar Mike. Mike is about to ride a bear. 
The bear tries to scare Mike. Mike tries to scare the bear. A helicopter flies by overhead. 
Mike is running away from the bear. Jenny is scared of the bear. The Bear is after Jenny's Pizza. 
The bear sneaks up on Mike and Jenny. The bear likes pepperoni pizza. The sun is going behind the clouds. 
The bear scared Jenny and Mike. The pizza is on the picnic table. The sun is hiding behind a cloud. 
A bear is holding a pizza. Jenny is running away. A bear is growling at Mike and Jenny. 
Mike and Jenny are happy. A Bear in a hat growls at Jenny Jenny has a Pizza. 
A bear is near a table. Jenny is very afraid. Mike is near a pizza. 
The bear scared Mike and Jenny. The bear took the pizza. Mike is running away from the scary bear. 
Mike is near a table. A bear is near mike. Jenny is very afraid. 
Jenny is not happy. Jenny is near a pizza. A bear is near a yellow table. 
The bear is wearing sunglasses. The bear is holding a pizza. Mike and Jenny are scared of the bear. 
Mike has a hat on. An airplane is in the sky. Jenny is very sad. 
An owl is perched on the swingset. Mike is mad at the owl. Jenny is running away from the owl. 
The sun is in the sky. Mike is chasing Jenny. The owl is in the apple tree. 
Jenny is wearing the hat. Mike is under the tree. The ball is under the tree. Mike does not want to share the ball with Jenny. Jenny is sad that Mike will not play with her. Jenny is running away from Mike. 
Mike is chasing Jenny. Jenny is running away crying. Mike is by the apple tree. 
Angry playing with mechanical bull tired 
Jenny is sad because Mike is chasing her. Mike is holding a baseball bat. Mike is wearing sunglasses. 
Mike and Jenny are beside the riding toy. Mike and Jenny are looking at the cat. Jenny is sitting in the grass. 
Mike is chasing Jenny Mike is very angry There is a plane in the sky 
Mike is very mad. Jenny is running away from Mike. Mike has an owl on his bat. 
The dog is in the sandbox. The slide is next to the sandbox. Mike is holding a toy shove. 
Mike is in the sandbox There is a dog next to Jenny Jenny is sad 
Mike talks to Jenny. Jenny is sad to fall in the sand. The dog wants the baseball glove. 
Jenny is very sad. Mike is very shock. Jenny is near a dog. 
Jenny is crying in the sandbox. Mike is surprised that Jenny is crying. The dog is standing by the sandbox. 
Mike and Jenny are in the sand. The dog wants to play. There is a kite in the sky. 
Jenny is sitting in the sand box. Mike is sitting on the sand box. The dog is standing by the sand box. 
Jenny is sitting in a sand-box. Mike is wearing blue. Mik